Skip Links U.S. Department of State
Home Contact Us Email this Page FOIA Privacy Notice Archive
Search __________ Go
U.S. Department of State [i_spcr08.gif] About the State Dept.
Press and Public Affairs Travel and Living Abroad Countries and Regions International Issues History, Education and Culture Business Center Other Services Employment
[Print Friendly Version]
Europe and Central Asia
Albania
I. Summary
Albania continues to be used as a transit point for heroin, cocaine and marijuana due to its strategic location, weak police and judicial systems, and lax border controls.
Heroin is typically routed through the "Balkan Route" of Turkey-Bulgaria-Macedonia-Albania and on to Italy and Greece.
Drug abuse is not a major problem but is increasing.
Largely in response to international pressure and assistance, the government has begun confronting criminal elements more aggressively, but lack of resources and corruption make it an uphill battle.
The government has drafted some narcotics legislation in an effort to strengthen the anti-drug unit established in 1998 under the Ministry of Public Order.
Albania is not a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
The government continues its efforts to build security and stability throughout Albania.
One of its major accomplishments this year was the establishment of law and order in areas that had been almost totally out of central government control since 1997.
The judiciary is engaged in improving the legal system and developing law enforcement skills, though it remains weak and subject to corruption.
The current government of Prime Minister Ilir Meta, in power since October 1999, has begun to implement commitments to crack down on organized crime.
The Albanian military and police work closely with the Italian police and coastal patrol organizations to shut down smuggling runs of illegal immigrants, drugs and other contraband across the Adriatic to Italy.
Plagued by severe unemployment, crime, and lack of infrastructure, the Albanian public has little interest in the problem of drug abuse.
There are no independent organizations that compile data on drug use in Albania, nor are significant government assets dedicated to tracking the problem.
The limited press and media coverage on the subject speculates that drug use, especially among adolescents in cities, is on the rise.
There are no special treatment centers for drug addicts.
III.
Country Action Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
The government recently drafted two laws, inspired in part by the 1998 UN Drug Convention, that call for national coordination of policies regarding use and trafficking of narcotics as well as establishing a framework to improve criminal investigations in drug-related cases, but no date was set for parliament to consider these drafts.
The government is also taking an active role with its Balkan neighbors bilaterally and in regional initiatives to combat organized crime.
Albania is an active participant in the Stability Pact and the Southeastern European Cooperative Initiative (SECI), and plans to participate in SECI's regional anti-crime center in Bucharest.
Accomplishments.
Albanian police provided evidence to U.S. authorities in Albania in 1999 on a U.S. narcotics case in which the drugs were sent through Albania to the U.S.
In 1999, the government cracked down on cannabis production in 44 villages across 11 districts, mostly in southern Albania.
Anti-drug authorities do not have the capacity to determine crop size and yields, but estimate that police destroyed 91 thousand plants, or more than 70 percent of the local cannabis crop.
Police report they destroyed 5 marijuana processing labs.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
Authorities report that in 1999, police arrested 417 persons accused of drug trafficking and seized more than 7 kilograms of heroin, 2 kilograms of cocaine, 4500 kilograms of marijuana, and 13 liters of hashish oil.
Police efforts to combat distribution of illicit narcotics may be increasingly effective since the government now has greater authority over areas previously out of their control.
In cooperation with Italian authorities, Albanian authorities have made some progress in interdicting narcotics smugglers at sea.
Corruption.
Corruption remains a deeply-entrenched problem.
Low salaries and social acceptance of graft make it difficult to combat corruption among police, magistrates, and border officials.
Agreements and Treaties.
Albania has an extradition treaty with the U.S. dating from November 14, 1935.
Although it is not a party to any of the UN narcotics conventions, Albania is attempting to pass legislation consistent with the goals and objectives of the 1988 UN Drug Convention, as stated above.
Albania does not have any counternarcotics agreements with other countries.
Cultivation and Production.
According to authorities in the anti-drug unit, cannabis is the only drug grown and processed in Albania, and is typically for consumption or sale in Turkey and Greece.
They also report that cannabis production diminished in 1999 because last year's huge supply exceeded demand.
Demand Reduction.
Drug abuse is a comparatively new problem in Albania and the government and Albanian society have been slow to address it.
Local and national authorities do not believe the problem is particularly widespread, owing both to traditional cultural norms and low levels of discretionary income.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
Albanian authorities cooperated fully with U.S. authorities in 1999 on law enforcement and transit issues, although few of these cases involved drug issues.
Only one course was provided by the U.S. in 1999 and that was an 8-week counternarcotics course at the International Law Enforcement Academy in Budapest, Hungary.
Additional courses for law enforcement and judicial infrastructure development were provided.
The Road Ahead.
The U.S. will continue to encourage Albania to crack down on illegal drug trafficking and use, offer law enforcement assistance, and support legal reform.
While no specific counternarcotics training has been programmed for FY2000, U.S. assistance will increase to provide additional guidance and training to law enforcement and judiciary bodies, including the assignment of a legal advisor.
Armenia
I. Summary
Armenia is not a major drug-producing country, and domestic consumption is relatively small.
The Government of Armenia (GOAM), recognizing its potential as a transit route for international narcotics shipments, is meanwhile attempting to improve its interdiction ability.
The Armenian parliament is presently considering legislation which would strengthen the Interior Ministry's mandate to combat drug trafficking.
Because of limited government resources, however, counternarcotics programs emphasize prevention with little funding for treatment.
In 1993, Armenia ratified the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Due to its geographical position at the Caucasus crossroads between Europe and Asia, Armenia has the potential to become an emerging transit point for international drug trafficking.
Armenia is presently a secondary trafficking route for drugs because of limited transport between it and neighboring countries.
Armenia's borders with Azerbaijan and Turkey remain closed due to the Nagorno-Karabakh conflict, but when these borders open, drug transiting could increase significantly.
GOAM's immediate concern is to begin to prepare its law enforcement capabilities for this situation.
Drug abuse does not constitute a serious problem in Armenia.
The local market for narcotics, according to the Interior Ministry, is not large and the main drugs of choice are opium and cannabis.
The Interior Ministry reported that 40.6 kilograms of cannabis and 1.99 kilograms of opium were confiscated in 1999.
"Hard" drugs, like heroin and morphine, are the drugs of choice for an estimated 10 percent of drug addicts in Armenia.
Heroin first appeared in the Armenian drug market in 1996, and since then there has been a small upward trend in heroin sales.
The Interior Ministry confiscated 180 grams of heroin during the first nine months of 1999, as compared to 63 grams during the same period in 1998.
The average price for one gram of heroin in the Armenian market is $100-200.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
A draft law on narcotic drugs, psychotropic substances and components has been prepared by the Interior Ministry, which would allow it to regulate traffic in narcotic drugs and precursor substances and would give the Ministry a clear lead-agency mandate for combating drug trafficking.
The draft is currently undergoing legal clearance.
Once approved, it will be sent to the parliament.
The new Armenian draft criminal code includes a statute that for the first time makes money laundering a criminal offense.
The draft criminal law is anticipated to pass its third and final reading in parliament in 2000.
The Interior Ministry has also drafted a decree for the establishment of a joint committee to update the classification of drugs and to introduce stricter control over licit production, sale, and distribution of pharmaceutical drugs of a psychotropic nature.
The decree is currently undergoing interagency clearance.
Accomplishments.
According to the Interior Ministry, several tons of wild cannabis hemp and small amounts of poppy were eradicated by the police in 1999.
The Interior Ministry reports that 1105 drug-related crimes and offenses were committed in 1999.
Ministry statistics for the first nine months of 1999 further reflect that there were 401 arrests for trafficking of drugs and psychotropic substances.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
In 1999, the Interior Ministry began to deploy joint teams of Armenian police and customs representatives at each customs post and checkpoint.
The Ministry obtained fifteen drug-sniffer dogs from Western Europe for this purpose.
Corruption.
Although corruption is rampant in Armenia, there were no cases reported of government officials being involved in drug-related corruption in 1999.
Agreements and Treaties.
Armenia is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, the 1961 UN Single Convention as amended by the 1972 Protocol, and the 1971 Convention on Psychotropic Substances.
Armenia is a signatory to the 1992 Kiev and 1996 Dushanbe narcotics control assistance agreements of the NIS countries.
In 1999, Armenia, Georgia and Iran signed a trilateral agreement on cooperation to combat drug trafficking.
Armenia has also signed bilateral agreements on cooperation against illicit traffic in narcotics and psychotropic substances with the Customs Service of Turkmenistan, Customs Committee of Georgia, and the Customs Committee of Tajikistan.
Cultivation and Production.
Cannabis (hemp) and opium poppy grow wild in northern areas of Armenia, particularly in the Lake Sevan basin and in some mountainous areas.
No illicit laboratories producing synthetic drugs were discovered in Armenia in 1999.
Drug Flow/Transit.
Transit of illegal drugs is recognized as the most serious concern for the GOAM, however, no estimates of the total amount of drugs transported through Armenia are available.
The main drug routes run between Iran, Russia, and Ukraine and almost all heroin brought to Armenia originates from those countries.
The Interior Ministry estimates that 55 percent of drugs are smuggled into Armenia by trucks and other motor vehicles and 43 percent by air.
Demand Reduction.
There are no reliable statistics on the number of drug addicts in Armenia.
However, the Interior Ministry estimates the number of drug addicts in Armenia at about 20,000.
Slightly over half of these are believed to be unemployed, 20 percent are students, and 7 percent serve in the military.
The only health agency responsible for treatment of drug addicts is the state-funded narcotics dispensary.
Established in 1976, this agency has barely kept its doors open in the last few years due to an almost complete lack of funding.
According to narcotics dispensary officials, fewer than 25 drug addicts were treated in the hospital during 1999.
In 1999, the Interior Ministry also registered an increase of drug abuse among women, although statistics were not released.
A recent opinion poll carried out by an Armenian newspaper revealed that one out of every eight teenage boys and one out of 42 teenage girls had used a narcotic drug at least once.
The Armenian Emergency Management Administration, together with the Interior Ministry, produced four documentaries on drug abuse as part of an "early intervention" campaign.
Presentations of the documentaries were held in all higher educational institutions, including the medical university.
Nevertheless, demand reduction is one of the most serious concerns of health authorities, due to poor financing, a lack of communication with remote rural areas, and a lack of interest in "preventative actions" on the part of local NGOs.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
New venues of cooperation were established between the U.S. and Armenian law enforcement agencies through the U.S. Legal Attaché in Kiev and the DEA Attaché from Ankara.
At the request of the Counternarcotics Department of the Ministry of Interior, in April 1999, a U.S. Defense Department narcotics detection dog-training team came to Armenia to work with Armenian narcotics dog-handlers to improve the GOAM's narcotic interdiction capability.
An Armenian representative also participated in a U.S. counternarcotics dog-training seminar in August 1999.
In addition, Armenian officials have participated in U.S.-funded training sessions at the International Law Enforcement Academy (ILEA) in Budapest, Hungary.
In 1998, a Department of State funded U.S. Treasury advisory team launched a program on combating money laundering and economic crimes for Armenian law enforcement officers and judges.
Drug enforcement was one of the aspects of the program.
In 1999, this program was expanded to address corruption and legislative issues.
In April 1999, a team of experts from the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms (ATF) conducted a needs assessment of Armenia's forensic laboratories, with the goal of providing equipment and training for Armenian forensic practitioners.
The Road Ahead.
The USG will initiate discussions with the Armenian government regarding training and equipment to improve its efforts on interdiction of contraband smuggling including narcotics.
Also, the Armenian government will be encourage increase its cooperation with neighboring countries in a regional effort to control drug trafficking through the Caucasus.
Austria
I. Summary
Austria is primarily a transit country for drug trafficking from the Balkans to western European markets.
Illegal drug consumption is not a severe problem in Austria, and there is no significant production or cultivation of illegal substances.
Organized drug trafficking is performed largely by non- Austrian criminal groups.
New investigative tools implemented in 1998 have helped contain the growth of this crime.
While not considered an important regional financial center, offshore tax haven or banking center, Austria remains an attractive site for drug-related money laundering.
The government continues to implement measures to narrow avenues for money launderers and facilitate asset seizure and forfeiture.
Cooperation with U.S. authorities is excellent; however, Austrian counternarcotics law-enforcement authorities acknowledge considerable underfunding and lack of personnel to do their job.
Austria ratified the 1971 and 1988 UN drug conventions in 1997.
II.
Status of Country
There has been no change in overall trends regarding organized drug crimes in Austria since 1998.
Although not a significant producer of illicit drugs, Austria remains a transit country for drug- related organized crime along the major European drug routes.
Foreign-based drug crimes by organized groups continued to grow in Austria in 1999.
A November 1999 government report maintains that up to 30 percent of serious crimes in Austria in 1999 can be traced to organized crime groups, most of which originate in the NIS.
Despite limited appeal of anonymous passbook savings accounts for criminal purposes, possibilities for money laundering through other, unmonitored transactions remain.
III.
Country Action Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
There were no fundamental changes in the legal, political and organizational framework to fight drug use and drug-related crime in 1999.
Key legislation that became effective in 1998 (Narcotic Substances Act) focuses on therapy for drug users but maintains severe penalties for drug dealers.
While drug dealers may face up to 20 years in prison, first-time users of cannabis may avoid criminal proceedings if they agree to therapy.
A 1998 law allows for technical law enforcement surveillance of persons strongly suspected of having committed crimes that are punishable by terms of imprisonment of up to 10 years.
These regulations have facilitated the surveillance of persons for whom police have evidence leading to "substantial suspicion" that they belong to a criminal organization.
The Ministry of the Interior plans to increase the use of surveillance techniques in the future.
A "police powers law," effective in 1999, authorizes investigators to obtain personal data from private telephone companies in clearly defined situations, including suspicion of organized crimes.
A proposal to allow police to collect and analyze information about likely extremist/terrorist groups without judicial approval and prior to the establishment of "substantiated suspicion" has been repeatedly postponed, but will be reintroduced in the 1999-2000 legislative session.
Accomplishments.
With the help of new legal tools (see policy initiatives section) and the support of the DEA Country Office, police arrested over 100, mostly African, drug dealers in May and September 1999.
According to Austrian authorities, the suspects formed part of a Nigerian drug cartel involved in drug dealing and money laundering in Austria.
Investigators believe the dealers received the drugs, mainly cocaine and heroin, from South America and Asia.
Daily turnover in Austria from this drug trade was estimated at around U.S. $ 40,000.
Approximately half of the arrested drug dealers, including the key suspect, were released due to insufficient evidence.
Four have been convicted and the rest await trial.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
In 1998 (1999 figures not yet available), the overall number of domestic drug-related criminal offenses decreased by 7 percent to 16,624 compared to the previous year.
Serious drug-related crime dropped by 19 percent to 2,198 over the same period.
However, authorities still maintain that one out of two criminal offenses in Austria is drug-related.
While the number of seizures dropped slightly (5 percent) to 6,849 in 1998, the amount of confiscated illegal drugs rose by 9 percent to over 1,700 kilograms.
Corruption.
Austrian ratification of the OECD anti-bribery convention is complete.
The ratification instrument was deposited with the OECD in Paris on May 19, 1999.
Implementing domestic legislation has been in place since October 1, 1998.
The GOA's public-corruption laws recognize and punish the abuse of power by a public official.
Tax deductibility of bribes and any gray market payments are no longer possible in Austria.
No records exist yet to assess the degree of enforcement.
There were no cases pending at year's end that involve any bribery of foreign public officials.
The U.S. Government is not aware of any high-level Austrian government officials' involvement in drug-related corruption.
Agreements and Treaties.
The U.S.-Austrian Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty entered into force on August 1, 1998.
The U.S. and Austria exchanged instruments of ratification on October 27, 1999, for a new U.S.-Austria extradition treaty.
The treaty entered into force on January 1, 2000, replacing a 1930 extradition treaty and a 1934 supplementary extradition convention.
The new treaty is a modern dual criminality treaty, i.e., it no longer lists specific extraditable offenses, but makes extraditable all criminal offenses that are prosecuted in both countries and carry a penalty of more than one year or a residual penalty of more than three months.
Austria is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, the 1971 UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances, and the 1961 Single Convention on Narcotic Drugs and its 1972 protocol.
It ratified the Council of Europe Convention in 1997 and the Europol convention in 1998.
Vienna is the seat of UNDCP, and Austria is a UNDCP major donor.
The city of Vienna and various Austrian ministries co-sponsored a UNDCP training program in Kazakhstan in October 1999.
Vienna is a co-sponsor of the "UN-Vienna Civil Society Award"-- a U.S. $100,000 prize given to individuals and organizations fighting drug abuse and organized crime.
In July 1999 UN Secretary General Annan awarded the prize to organizations from India, Uganda, Japan, and Mexico.
Austria participates in the World Health Organization, the Dublin group within the EU, the Financial Action Task Force on Money Laundering (FATF) and the Council of Europe's "Pompidou Group."
Austria supports the Southeastern Europe Cooperative Initiative (SECI) Anti-Crime Center in Bucharest.
In December 1999, Austria earmarked U.S. $ 20,000 for future vocational training projects in Bolivia, keyed to combat illicit cultivation of drugs.
Cultivation.
The U.S. Government is not aware of any significant cultivation or production of illicit drugs in Austria.
Drug Flow/Transit.
Traditionally, the routes of the Balkan drug path have been the major venues for illegal import/transit of southwest Asian heroin through Austria.
The illicit trade is carried out mainly by Turkish groups, more recently also by traffickers from Albania and Macedonia, followed by nationals of countries of the former Yugoslavia and by Romanian and Bulgarian citizens.
As in previous years, traffickers continued to use nearby Bratislava/Slovakia as one of the temporary depositories for heroin.
Cocaine is imported by couriers of South American drug cartels, but also African traffickers, who increasingly rely on eastern European airports.
Domestic programs and demand reduction.
Austrian authorities view drug addiction as a disease rather than a crime, a fact reflected in 1997 drug legislation and in related court decisions.
Recent years have seen a growing trend toward an "integrative view" in drug policy, with special emphasis on the prevention of social marginalization of drug addicts.
Demand reduction puts emphasis on primary prevention, drug treatment and counseling, as well as "harm reduction."
The use of heroin for therapeutic purposes is generally not allowed.
Primary intervention extends from preschool to secondary-school levels and relies on educational campaigns inside and outside school fora.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
Although Austria has no specific bilateral narcotics agreement with the U.S., cooperation with U.S. investigative efforts is excellent.
The Austrian Ministry of Interior has announced plans to establish a liaison office at the Austrian Embassy in Washington, D.C., to handle bilateral issues involving all forms of crime, including illegal narcotics.
Road Ahead.
The U.S. will continue to support Austrian efforts to create more effective tools for law enforcement.
Within the context of U.S.-EU initiatives, promoting a better understanding of U.S. drug policy will remain a priority for the U.S.
Azerbaijan
I. Summary
Azerbaijan is located along a drug transit route running from Iran and Central Asia, north into Russia and west into Western Europe.
Consumption and cultivation of narcotics are at low but increasing levels.
During 1999, the main drugs seized were opium and cannabis.
Section 907 of the Freedom Support Act has precluded the funding of U.S. counternarcotics assistance in 1999.
Azerbaijan is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Azerbaijan's main narcotics problem is the increased transit of drugs through its territory resulting from the disruption of the "Balkan route" due to regional ethnic conflicts in several countries of the former Yugoslavia.
Narcotics from Afghanistan and South Asia enter from Iran or cross the Caspian Sea from Central Asia and continue on to markets in Russia and Europe.
Azerbaijan shares a 700-km frontier with Iran, but its border control forces are insufficiently trained and equipped to patrol it effectively.
Iranian and other traffickers are exploiting this situation.
Domestic consumption is growing with over 12,000 persons registered in hospitals for drug abuse in Azerbaijan.
The actual level of drug abuse is estimated to be many times higher.
Government authorities suspect that persons displaced by the Nagorno-Karabakh conflict have been drawn into drug trafficking out of economic necessity.
The Government of Azerbaijan continues to claim that the Armenian occupied areas of Azerbaijan are used for drug cultivation.
The Azerbaijan government also maintains that narcotics are transported across the approximately 100 km of Azerbaijan's border with Iran that is under Armenian control.
III.
Country Action Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
The government recently created a "State Committee on Drug Control" headed by Deputy Prime Minister Ali Hasanov.
This committee has been charged with implementing United Nations General Assembly resolutions relating to drug control.
The Minister of Education and the Minister of Youth and Sports are currently designing a new program for the year 2000 to treat drug addicts.
In May, the Ministry of Internal Affairs initiated a pilot program in the southern portion of the country, along the border with Iran, to organize local counternarcotics police officials to work closer together across local jurisdictions.
Accomplishments.
The United Nations Narcotics Drug Control Program has just completed a program of technical counternarcotics assistance in Azerbaijan.
A new narcotics control law entered into force in August 1999.
In November a new "Law on the Police" entered into force, which provides legal authority for the operational activities of police officials.
Parliament is currently debating a new "criminal code" which will authorize the police to retain not only the assets they seize, which have been used in the commission of a crime, but also assets which have been gained as a result of criminal activity.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
There were 1,705 drug-related arrests during the first nine months of 1999.
Police lack basic equipment and have little experience in modern counternarcotics methods.
Border control facilities on the border with Iran are inadequate to prevent narcotics smuggling.
Corruption.
Corruption permeates the public and private sectors.
Government officials including the president and prime minister have acknowledged the gravity of the problem, but have taken no significant concrete action.
Current legislation has proven inadequate to address police and judicial corruption.
Agreements and Treaties.
Azerbaijan is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, the 1971 Convention on Psychotropic Substances, and the 1961 UN Single Convention.
Azerbaijan signed a protocol of intent on counternarcotics cooperation with Iran in 1996.
There is no extradition or mutual legal assistance treaty in effect between the U.S. and Azerbaijan.
Cultivation and Production.
Cannabis and poppy are cultivated illegally, mostly in southern Azerbaijan.
During the first ten months of 1999, law enforcement authorities discovered and destroyed about 388 tons of cannabis and about 45 kilos of potential opium gum, which were under cultivation.
Drug Flow/Transit.
Opium and poppy straw originating in Afghanistan and South Asia transit Azerbaijan from Iran, or from Central Asia across the Caspian Sea.
Drugs are also smuggled through Azerbaijan to Russia, then on to Europe.
For example, Azerbaijan traffickers smuggle Afghan heroin from Azerbaijan to the Baltic countries.
Azerbaijan cooperates with Black Sea and Caspian Sea states in tracking and interdicting narcotics shipments, especially morphine base and heroin.
Caspian Sea cooperation includes efforts to interdict narcotics transported across the Caspian Sea by ferry.
Law enforcement officials report they have received good cooperation from Russia, but have encountered considerable reluctance from Iran to assist in counternarcotics efforts.
Demand Reduction.
Opium and cannabis products are the most commonly used drugs.
The Government of Azerbaijan has begun education initiatives directed at curbing domestic drug consumption.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
U.S. law enforcement exchange of information with Azerbaijan has increased since 1998.
However, no counternarcotics programs were initiated because Section 907 of the Freedom Support Act prohibits such assistance to the Government of Azerbaijan.
The Road Ahead.
Without legal authority to provide U.S. counternarcotics assistance to the Government of Azerbaijan, a key strategic partner in improving regional stability in the Caucasus, the U.S. is only able to engage in piecemeal bilateral counternarcotics cooperation with Azerbaijan.
Belarus
I. Summary
The economic, political and geographical situation of Belarus gives it the potential to become a major drug transit and production site.
Economic conditions have sharply deteriorated in 1999.
The Belarusian government lacks both the legislative framework and the financial resources to combat drug trafficking.
Belarus' location between Russia and the West, its good rail and road transportation, and a customs union with Russia that eliminated internal borders between the two countries has facilitated smuggling of contraband.
Belarus considers itself a filter of illegal immigration and contraband materials, but enforcement of its border controls is uneven.
Belarus is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
According to Government of Belarus (GOB) statistics reported at a February 1999 Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS) crime and drug conference held in Minsk, the GOB attributes 2.1 percent of all reported crimes to illicit drug trafficking.
Crimes registered included: stealing narcotic and strong action substances; organizing or maintaining drug dens for using drugs; and forging medical documents with the aim of procuring drugs.
Stringent internal security measures control organized crime while irregular importation by selected GOB state agencies are official sanctioned.
Belarus has regional and bilateral law enforcement agreements against organized crime and drug trafficking.
However, cooperation with neighboring countries is weak.
III.
Country Actions Against Narcotics in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
Responsibility for investigating and discovering narcotics-related crime is divided among the Ministry of Internal Affairs, National Security Service (KGB), Customs Committee, Border Guards, and Ministry of Health.
An interagency commission for combating crimes and drug abuse is charged with coordinating the activities of the above listed agencies as well as state committees, public associations, and international organizations.
The GOB has periodically announced campaigns to combating organized crime and drug trafficking, however, the level of interdicted smuggled narcotics or drugs confiscated from domestic seizures has been marginal.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
In 1999, there were no significant arrests or seizures regarding drug trafficking reported.
Police statistics indicate that during 1999, they eradicated small plots of poppy (40 acres), hemp (4 acres), and cannabis (.5 acres).
Corruption.
Corruption among state enterprise directors is a serious problem affecting the economy, especially firms engaged in officially sanctioned importation alcohol and tobacco, which is then smuggled into Russia.
Although several individuals have been arrested for corruption, their cases appear to be politically motivated.
Treaties and Agreements.
Belarus is a party to the 1988 UN Convention, the 1961 UN Single Convention and the 1972 Protocol thereto, and the 1971 UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances.
The GOB has signed an agreement on drug control assistance with Italy, and has also signed interstate treaties on assistance with Lithuania and China.
Belarus is a party to the CIS convention on legal assistance and cooperation on civil, family, and criminal cases.
The USG has concluded a Customs Mutual Assistance Agreement (CMAA) with the Government of Belarus.
Belarus is a member of Interpol; however, Belarusian law has no provision for extradition.
Cultivation and Production.
Domestic cultivation of drug crops is minimal.
Belarus does however have major chemical production facilities, much of which are lying idle.
There is presently no legislation in Belarus dealing with precursor chemicals.
A variety of laboratories have the technical capabilities for the production of synthetic narcotics, but Belarus law enforcement does not have resources for sophisticated investigation of clandestine production.
Drug Flow/Transit.
Belarus has good rail and road connections running east to Russia, west to Poland, north to the Baltics, and south to Ukraine.
Incidents of drug transportation destined for Poland and Germany have increased dramatically as a result of the customs union that eliminated internal borders between Belarus and Russia.
Some illegal immigrants arriving in Belarus attempt to finance travel to the West through narcotics smuggling.
Demand Reduction.
Most Belarusian addicts use products made of opium poppy, poppy oil, or cannabis.
Use of synthetic drugs, heroin, cocaine, barbiturates and other "hard" drugs is small but slowly increasing.
It is estimated that the number of latent addicts in the country exceeds GOB official estimates by a factor of ten.
No national drug abuse prevention strategy has been formulated in Belarus.
The main emphasis is on treatment of current drug addicts, while only limited efforts are devoted to preventative and educational programs.
Treatment for drug addicts is generally performed in psychiatric hospitals, either through arrest or self-enrollment.
While the objective of these programs is to achieve detoxification and physical stabilization, knowledge is lacking on how to further assist addicts with psychological counseling and social rehabilitation.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Initiatives/The Road Ahead.
Since 1997, the USG has conducted a policy of selected engagement toward the GOB because of the latter's suppression of democratic activities and its violation of human rights.
No direct assistance to the Belarus state sector, including law enforcement, has been provided by the USG since that time and none is anticipated in the future, until such time as the democratic and human rights situation in Belarus improves.
Belgium
I. Summary
The Kingdom of Belgium is not a significant producer of narcotics or precursor chemicals used in the production of illicit narcotics; however, it is a major trader in chemicals and is frequently used as a transit country for precursor chemicals destined for South America.
Narcotics traffickers continue to exploit Belgium's large port facilities, transportation infrastructure, and central location in Western Europe for transshipment of illicit drugs.
Belgium experienced, through 1999, a radical increase of trafficking of MDMA (Ecstasy).
Belgium is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Belgian law enforcement agencies have observed a continued increase in drug trafficking through Belgium from Asia and the Middle East via the Former Soviet Republics, primarily shipped via container through the well-established trafficking networks based in the seaports of Antwerp and Zeebrugge.
Combating MDMA (Ecstasy) trafficking has assumed a higher priority.
Ecstasy tablets are manufactured at clandestine labs on both sides of the Netherlands border, and carried via express mail companies, air-freight or couriers to other areas of Europe, and, increasingly, to the U.S. Ecstasy transiting Brussels through Zavantem airport is mainly controlled by Israeli trafficking organizations based in the Netherlands and in Antwerp, Belgium.
Belgium is cooperating with U.S. law enforcement to disrupt this route for illicit drug trafficking.
Cannabis resin (hashish) is the most widely distributed and used illicit substance in Belgium, but heroin abuse produces the most important health and social problems, including drug-related crime.
Belgian police continue to voice concern over the use of ecstasy and amphetamines by young people and over the collateral health ramifications.
III.
Country Action against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
In 1998, the Government adopted a plan to re-organize the police forces, currently scheduled for implementation by April 2001.
At the federal level, the plan will integrate the Gendarmerie and the Judicial Police into a police force to head major criminal investigations, including significant national and international narcotics investigations; the plan also provides for a new anti-corruption service for this federal police force.
At the local level, the plan will merge Gendarmerie with Municipal Police.
The Ministry of Justice maintains drug liaison offices in 13 foreign cities (covering 33 countries), staffed by either Judicial Police or Gendarmerie officers, in Bangkok, Bogota, the Hague, Istanbul, Madrid, Moscow, Paris, Rabat, Rome, Vienna, Warsaw, Washington, and Wiesbaden.
The Rabat and Bangkok offices opened in 1999.
In August, a new Belgian liaison officer assumed the post in Washington, after a nine-month vacancy in the position.
Accomplishments.
In 1999, Belgium entered into bilateral police cooperation agreements with Bulgaria, Hungary, and Romania, which are comprehensive in nature and provide a framework for cooperation on narcotics matters.
Parliament passed new legislation on organized crime that defines a "criminal organization" and criminalizes membership in such an organization; it also endorses the use of undercover operations and wiretaps by law enforcement agents.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
Belgian law enforcement authorities pro-actively investigate individuals and organizations involved in illegal narcotics trafficking into and through Belgium.
The law enforcement efforts of the Gendarmerie currently focus on major trafficking organizations, particularly those involved in trafficking of heroin and, most recently, those involved in MDMA (Ecstasy).
In 1999, Belgium fully met the objectives of the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
Belgian authorities initiate and conduct investigations that are generally effective.
Interdiction efforts by Belgian Customs Authorities at Antwerp and Zeebrugge are frequently successful despite insufficient resources and manpower.
Customs officials report that a five-man team of inspectors is responsible for all port activities involving drugs, while on a daily basis three to four thousand containers are loaded and unloaded at the port of Antwerp alone.
The inspection team has the capacity to search five to 10 containers per week.
Customs also reports increased activity involving the ships' crew members which might indicate, for example, smuggling of smaller quantities of drugs by individual crew members or larger operations in which crew members arrange to off-load large amounts of drugs from the ship before reaching the dock.
Corruption.
Corruption is not judged to be a problem within the narcotics units of the law enforcement agencies.
Legal measures exist to combat and punish corruption.
Agreements and Treaties.
The U.S. and Belgium have long had an extradition treaty; an updated treaty entered into force in 1997.
The U.S. and Belgium have also ratified a supplementary treaty on extradition to promote the repression of terrorism, but it has not yet entered into force.
A new MLAT entered into force January 1,2000.
The U.S. has concluded a Customs Mutual Assistance Agreement (CMAA) with Belgium.
The Government of Belgium is currently negotiating police cooperation agreements with Russia and Slovakia, and expects these agreements to enter into force in 2000.
Belgium has been a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention since 1995.
Belgium is also a party to the 1961 UN Single Convention and its 1972 Protocol.
Belgium is a member of the Financial Action Task Force (FATF).
As a Schengen member state, Belgium participates in the Schengen Working Group on Drugs.
Belgium is a member of the Council of Europe's (COE) Pompidou Group.
Belgium has fully implemented the EU Directive on Money Laundering and participates in the contact committee established by the Directive.
Belgian authorities cooperate bilaterally on money laundering issues with Australia, Austria, Brazil, Bulgaria, Croatia, Cyprus, the Czech Republic, Finland, France, Greece, Hong Kong, Hungary, Italy, Latvia, Lithuania, Luxembourg, the Netherlands, Norway, Portugal, Slovenia, Spain, Sweden, Switzerland, the U.K., and the U.S.
Belgium is a member of several international anti-drug organizations, including the Heads of European Narcotics Law Enforcement Agencies (HONLEA), the European Committee to Combat Drugs (CELAD), and the Dublin Group.
Belgium is a member of the major donors group of the United Nations Drug Control Program (UNDCP).
Despite serious efforts by Belgian law enforcement to combat illegal drug production, trafficking and use, the Government of Belgium has reduced funding and support for multilateral eradication efforts.
It did, however, increase its UNDCP budget in 1999 to BF 15 Million (approx. $395,000).
Cultivation/Production.
There is no significant cultivation or production of illicit drugs in Belgium, although police have noted an increase in production of amphetamines and ecstasy, primarily in illegal labs on the Belgium/Netherlands border.
These labs are linked to criminal organizations that distribute the drugs within Europe and to the United States--most frequently through the cities of New York, Miami, Los Angeles and Orlando, Florida.
Drug Flow/Transit.
Belgium remains an important transit point for drug traffickers because of its port facilities (Antwerp is Europe's second busiest port), airports, excellent road connections to neighboring countries, and central geographic location.
Most illicit drugs pass through Belgium via the ports of Antwerp and Zeebrugge; across the border from the Netherlands; or through Brussels Zaventem airport.
Smuggling routes change constantly, but Belgian authorities believe an increasing number of heroin shipments arrive from Central Asia via Turkey.
Belgian Customs reports that the heroin is most probably concealed in containerized freight in relatively small quantities of 10-15 kilograms: because Antwerp is considered a "free trade zone," traffickers know that inspections of containerized freight are minimal.
These shipments typically take one of two trafficking routes: in northern Europe through Hungary, Poland, the Czech Republic, Slovakia and Austria, or in southern Europe through Italy.
The cannabis originates in Morocco, Latin America and South East Asia and arrives via land, air and sea routes.
Domestic Programs.
Belgium has an active anti-drug educational program that targets the country's youth, which the regional governments (Flanders, Wallonia, and Brussels) now administer.
Programs include education campaigns, drug hotlines, HIV and hepatitis prevention programs, detoxification programs, and a pilot program for "drug-free" prison sections.
Unlike the U.S. approach, the Belgian approach focuses on the individuals who influence young people, rather than the young people themselves.
Teachers, coaches and clergy, for example, are considered better suited to deliver the anti-drug message to the target audience because they already are known and respected by the young people.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
Cooperation between the United States and Belgium continues to be excellent and to expand.
DEA and FBI enjoy close and effective cooperation with the Judicial Police and the Gendarmerie.
U.S. law enforcement agencies represented in Brussels enjoy excellent working relationships with the Belgian National Magistrates and Prosecutors offices.
During 1999, representatives from the FBI, the Department of Justice, the Department of State and the Belgian Ministry of Justice met to continue a series of bilateral consultations on improving judicial cooperation and streamlining procedures in judicial assistance matters (including extradition cases).
Belgium participated with the U.S., the U.K., the Netherlands and France, in the 1999 Caribbean Maritime Counter-Drug Initiative.
Belgium is active in the Egmont Group, an informal forum for cooperation on money laundering issues, which held its inaugural meeting at the Egmont Palace in Brussels in 1995, under the sponsorship of the U.S. Financial Crimes Enforcement Network (FINCEN) and Belgium's Financial Intelligence Processing Unit (CTIF/CFI).
Belgium chairs the Egmont legal working group, which drafted a model memorandum of understanding on international cooperation on money laundering issues.
The Road Ahead.
The United States looks forward to continued close cooperation with Belgium in combating illicit drug trafficking and drug-related crime, and to continued Belgian participation in multilateral counternarcotics fora such as the Dublin Group.
Bosnia
I. Summary
Bosnia is a small market for drugs but a significant transshipment point for international narcotics.
While inter-entity law enforcement cooperation is improving and has resulted in several major drug seizures, the growing narcotics trade remains closely linked to organized crime, public sector corruption, and ethnic extremism.
The absence of effective border and customs controls, serious flaws in the judicial system, and the lack of political will to undertake serious reforms have left Bosnia a permissive environment for drug trafficking.
Bosnia is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention and is working closely with the UN Drug Control Program (UNDCP) as well as the U.S. and other regional states on counternarcotics issues.
II.
Status of the Country
Situated astride the historic Balkan smuggling routes, Bosnia remains a logical transshipment point between heroin and marijuana production centers in south Asia and markets in Western Europe.
Domestic production has not been a major problem to date, but Bosnian officials believe that the wartime black market dramatically increased drug trafficking.
Although the disproportionately large international community in Sarajevo is believed to be the primary internal narcotics market, local authorities have expressed concern that rapid urbanization, a relatively young population, high unemployment, and "foreign cultural influence" could contribute to the eventual development of a major market for narcotics consumption in Bosnia.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
Border controls have been tightened with the introduction of public hotlines to report customs violations in September and should improve further with the phased deployment of a state border service beginning December 31, 1999.
The USG and the international community continue to provide advice and assistance to local law enforcement agencies, including counternarcotics and task force training.
Efforts are underway to revise local laws regarding narcotics to ensure conformity with the UN Drug Convention.
Accomplishments.
Police counternarcotics operations have confiscated over 1.2 kilograms of heroin and have resulted in 335 arrests in 1999.
A single raid in Sarajevo in December 1998 seized a 38-kilogram shipment of heroin following a joint investigation with Croatian and Slovenian authorities.
With UNDCP support, narcotics arrests and seizures are recorded in centralized databases in both the Federation and the Republika Srpska (RS).
UNDCP has also sponsored joint counternarcotics exercises for Federation, RS, and cantonal officers, and has provided introductory training to over 1,500 Bosnian officers to date.
Bosnian authorities are working to formalize international cooperation through full integration into the Interpol network.
Police officers are increasingly equipped to conduct drug tests at crime scenes, while four police laboratories in the Federation and one in the RS are now capable of conducting sophisticated analysis to support narcotics investigations.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
Both narcotics-related arrests and drug seizures - including major successes such as the arrest of a smuggling ring in Maglaj in October - are on the rise.
Plans to expand the Federation Interior Ministry's anti-drug unit are under consideration.
Nonetheless, Bosnia remains largely dependent on the international community for leadership and material support in the war against drugs, as underscored by the necessity of multinational military action in October against anti-Dayton elements reportedly involved in narcotics trafficking.
Limited legal penalties for narcotics offenses, a lack of political will, and local resistance to Federation jurisdiction over narcotics offenses continue to prevent a fully integrated national counternarcotics strategy to focus on major traffickers.
Corruption.
Criminal elements involved in narcotics trafficking have been credibly linked to public officials.
Although proceeds from the narcotics trade are widely believed to support the parallel institutions maintained by ethnic extremists, there are no laws specifically targeting narcotics-related public sector corruption and there have been no legal/enforcement actions against public officials for narcotics-related offenses.
Combating the influence of criminal elements, corrupt officials, and ethnic extremists remains a leading priority for the embassy, the Multinational Peace Stabilization Force (SFOR), the United Nations Mission in Bosnia, and the Office of the High Representative (OHR).
Agreements and Treaties.
There is no bilateral agreement between Bosnia the United States specifically pertaining to counternarcotics.
A bilateral police training agreement does provide advice and assistance regarding a broad range of law enforcement issues, including investigative techniques and major case management.
Both the Federation and the Republika Srpska have honored their formal commitment to cooperate on narcotics issues and have worked closely with the UNDCP under the terms of an agreement signed in 1997.
Bosnia is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention and is actively pursuing a bilateral law enforcement cooperation agreement with Croatia to address regional narcotics trafficking.
Drug Flow and Transit.
Heroin and marijuana shipments through several overland routes have increased markedly in the past year.
Southwest Asian heroin from Turkey, Iran, Afghanistan and Pakistan is routinely smuggled through Bosnia.
Local authorities believe that Western Europe - not the U.S. - is the ultimate destination for this traffic.
Bosnian police officers have indicated that elements from each ethnic group and all major crime "families" are involved in the narcotics trade, often in collaboration.
They suspect - and are actively investigating - alleged links to German, Italian, Albanian, and Russian criminal elements.
Cultivation and Production.
Federation Interior Ministry officials believe that domestic cultivation is limited to marijuana crops grown in Herzegovina.
Domestic Programs.
Community policing programs sponsored by the USG, which include anti-drug segments, have reached over 40,000 Bosnian children.
Although there are no domestic substance abuse programs, pilot community outreach programs in Sarajevo and Zenica have been attended by over 18,000 Bosnians.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
The USG remains committed to providing the counternarcotics training and support necessary to encourage independent operations by Bosnian authorities.
The Road Ahead.
The international community's police assistance efforts will increasingly emphasize sophisticated technical training and intensive professional monitoring.
The USG will focus its training programs on organized crime, public sector corruption, counternarcotics, and border control.
A standardized national information management system, providing equal access to all law enforcement agencies and direct access to international police agencies, is essential to enhance the investigative capacity of Bosnian authorities.
Bulgaria
I. Summary
Centrally located on the Balkans route, Bulgaria is an important transit route between Turkey and Western Europe for Southwest Asian heroin and Southeast Asian marijuana.
Authorities have also seized maritime deliveries of South American cocaine.
The GOB is working to implement its 1998 money laundering law in accordance with European practices.
In March 1999, parliament passed a drug and precursors act to provide a sounder legislative basis for pursuing and prosecuting narcotics trafficking.
The GOB requires schools to offer a demand reduction program.
Law enforcement authorities cooperate actively with U.S. and other counterparts on counternarcotics cases and issues.
Bulgaria is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Bulgaria is a significant drug-transit country centrally located on three traditional Balkan routes between Turkey and, respectively, Serbia, Romania and the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia.
Clandestine labs produce amphetamines, and diverted acetic anhydride is transported from Bulgaria to Turkey.
The GOB has wide-reaching, anti-crime legislation, including the 1998 money laundering law.
As a result of 1998 legislation, the prosecutorial and investigative functions of the magistracy have been restructured.
The prosecutor general, in office since January 1999, envisions a more effective prosecutorial assault on crime, including narcotics trafficking.
III.
Country Action Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
National strategy against narcotics is coordinated by an inter-ministerial body composed of ministers or deputy ministers from 17 ministries and agencies.
This council has designated the National Service for Combating Organized Crime (NESEBOB) as the national focal point to gather and analyze information from all agencies.
NESEBOB has opened a Center for Narcotics Data Coordination in Sofia with five analysts.
It plans to open similar centers in Plovdiv and Varna, and will provide additional training for its analysts with funding from the EU Phare/UNDCP multi-country drugs project.
The government has made the fight against organized crime and corruption major priorities, and has pressed forward with an extensive legislative reform effort strengthening anti-crime legislation.
Accomplishments.
Significant accomplishments in 1999 have included the passage of a new law on drugs and narcotics, the recent establishment of the Narcotics Information Center, initial applications of the money laundering law in conformity with international standards, and the productive use of assistance from the EU Phare and other western sources.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
While the 1999 drug and precursors law provided the legislative framework for GOB anti-narcotics strategy, NESEBOB is attempting to carry out this strategy with a team approach.
The Narcotics Information Center will coordinate data from internal sources, from INTERPOL, and from Romania and Macedonia, then be expanded to include data from the region as a whole.
The goal is integration of national and regional anti-narcotics efforts.
An added instrument, especially in the investigation of money laundering, is the new financial intelligence body in the Ministry of Finance.
The move of many investigative functions from the former National Investigative Service to the police services, effective January 1, 2000, plans to streamline and accelerate narcotics investigations.
Significant seizures during 1999 included: Heroin, 281 kilograms; opium, 6.4 kilograms; cocaine, 24.5 kilograms; and marijuana, 232 kilograms.
Corruption.
Although there have been significant improvements under the current government, corruption continues to be a widely-alleged problem in Bulgaria, including among police and customs officials.
The U.S., however, has no specific information that any senior GOB official has been involved in drug trafficking or other narcotics-related crimes.
Agreements and Treaties.
Bulgaria is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, the 1961 UN Single Convention and its 1972 protocol, the 1971 UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances, and the 1990 Council of Europe Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of Proceeds from Crime.
Bulgaria is also a party to the 1957 Council of Europe Convention on Extradition, the 1959 European Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty on penal measures, and the 1983 Council of Europe Convention on Transfer of Sentenced Persons.
It also has a bilateral treaty with Turkey for transfer of convicted persons.
Bulgarian Customs has memoranda of understanding on mutual assistance and cooperation with several European counterparts and is negotiating or updating others.
The GOB coordinates with INTERPOL and Europol.
A 1924 extradition treaty and 1934 supplementary treaty are in force between the U.S. and Bulgaria.
Cultivation and Production.
There is no significant cultivation or production of any illicit narcotics in Bulgaria.
Drug Flow/Transit.
The main illegal drug transiting Bulgaria is heroin from the Golden Crescent and South Asian sources, although marijuana and cocaine also transit Bulgaria.
The northern Balkan route from Turkey through Bulgaria to Romania is the most frequently used overland route; although there are others through Serbia and the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia.
In 1999, GOB officials noted apparently increasing amounts of South American cocaine coming from Brazil.
The precursor chemical acetic anhydride, possibly produced in Bulgaria or coming from Macedonia, is transported from/through Bulgaria to Turkey.
Domestic Programs (Demand Reduction).
The drug abuse problem in Bulgaria is small but growing.
Experts estimate there are at least 45,000 heroin users, fewer than 10 percent of whom are in treatment.
Cocaine is too expensive for all but the wealthy.
Marijuana has traditionally been used in rural areas.
Ecstasy is an important and growing problem among university students.
Increases in drug consumption continue to be particularly noteworthy among the marginalized Roma (gypsy) population, among whom glue sniffing is a serious problem, as well as in prisons, in some localized geographic areas, and among traffickers.
Demand reduction is receiving increased attention.
The Ministry of Education requires the teaching in schools nationwide of health promotion modules on substance abuse.
There is also a World Health Organization program for health promotion in 30 target schools.
The Bulgarian National Center for Addictions provides training seminars on drug abuse for school teachers nationwide.
The center and the Institute of Public Health co-sponsor municipal demand reduction programs in six major cities and a number of smaller communities.
Three universities provide professional training in drug prevention.
Specialized professional training in drug treatment and demand reduction has been provided through programs sponsored by UNDCP, EU Phare, and the Council of Europe's Pompidou Group.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Strategies
The U.S. promotes increased attention to the problems of narcotics trafficking and money laundering, assists Bulgarian law enforcement and anti-crime legislative reform efforts with training, advisory assistance and some equipment.
It also encourages further cooperation between Bulgarian and U.S. law enforcement agencies, including DEA, the FBI and the Customs Service.
Bilateral Cooperation.
Bilateral cooperation between U.S. and Bulgarian law enforcement officials is excellent.
U.S. bilateral assistance has focused on mid-level training at the ILEA in Hungary.
The U.S. has also provided advisory assistance to the GOB in the drafting of money laundering legislation and reform of the penal code and procedural penal code.
The Road Ahead.
The U.S. will continue to encourage the GOB in anti-drug efforts, in combating money laundering, in drafting and implementing anti-crime legislative reforms and in mutual cooperation with U.S. law enforcement.
It will work with the GOB to identify law enforcement training, advisory and equipment needs, and provide limited assistance to meet those needs.
The U.S. will continue to encourage exchange of counternarcotics information with other states in the region and to promote increased regional, Western European and UNDCP support for Bulgarian law enforcement authorities.
Croatia
I. Summary
Croatia is not a major producer of illicit narcotics nor a major transit country.
However, with its extensive coastline, geographic location in southeast Europe, and limited resources for patrolling its coast and borders, it offers significant possibilities for transshipping narcotics.
Croatia's national narcotics strategy, which remained essentially unchanged from 1998, focused on reducing both the availability of and demand for narcotics.
During 1999 no new anti-narcotics laws were passed, although a government commission proposed new legislation combating narcotics abuse.
The Interior Ministry (MUP) was the government ministry most directly involved in anti-narcotics activities.
In addition to its domestic efforts, the MUP conducted operations along Croatia's borders, sometimes jointly with neighboring countries, designed to disrupt Balkan-Route drug trafficking.
Croatia is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Variants of the Balkan Route crossed a large part of Croatian territory prior to the breakup of Yugoslavia, and the Government of Croatia is concerned about increases in transshipment concomitant with the opening of borders and increased border traffic with Bosnia and Serbia.
Domestic narcotics abuse remains a priority area of attention, but not a problem that officials believe has significantly worsened during 1999.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
Croatia continued to pursue its national strategy for combating abuse of narcotics.
This initiative included implementation of measures to reduce both supply and demand for narcotics.
The Interior Ministry (MUP) and the Justice Ministry had primary responsibility for the law enforcement aspects of the national strategy, while the Ministries of Education and Health, with assistance from the MUP, had responsibility for the strategy to combat drug abuse.
The Interior Ministry's Drug Division oversees the work of smaller drug units in every police department throughout the country and maintains cooperative relationships with INTERPOL, as well as with counterparts in Italy, Germany, Hungary, Macedonia, Slovenia, and the U.S.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
During the first 11 months of 1999, 5,738 seizures of narcotics were made, and 5,560 persons were investigated by the police.
The number of seizures represents a 39 percent increase over 1998 figures.
Seized drugs included: Heroin, 12.7 kilograms; cocaine, 1.7 kilograms; marijuana, 139.4 kilograms; hashish, 6.5 kilograms; LSD 247.5 doses; ecstasy, 14,319 pills; and amphetamines, 0.5 kilograms.
Interior Ministry activities included gathering evidence against Croatians and members of organized crime groups, both domestic and international.
The ministry conducted a series of anti-crime and tactical operations at border crossings especially with Balkan Route countries on land and sea and at airports.
For example, Croatian and Slovenian police confiscated 39 kilograms of heroin during joint border operations and made several arrests.
From its annual budget, the Interior Ministry provided financial support for equipment purchases.
Corruption.
Throughout 1999 there continued to be allegations of corruption within senior levels of the then-ruling HDZ party; however, allegations linking officials to narcotics-related corruption have not been substantiated.
Agreements and Treaties.
No new agreements or treaties were entered into in 1999.
Croatia is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, the 1961 UN Single Convention and its 1972 protocol, and the 1971 UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances.
Extradition between Croatia and the U.S. is governed by the 1920 extradition treaty between the U.S. and Yugoslavia.
Pending passage of a new narcotics law, the government uses its adherence to the 1988 UN Drug Convention as the basis for prosecuting those suspected of trafficking in precursor chemicals.
Croatia has signed and ratified treaties and other international agreements on combating terrorism, drug abuse and drug trafficking, as well as organized crime, with Albania, Austria, Hungary, Italy, Macedonia, Poland, Slovenia, Turkey, and Ukraine.
Agreements with Bosnia-Herzegovina, the Czech republic, Pakistan, and the Russian Federation and are being drafted.
Cultivation/Production.
The Interior Ministry continues a program to identify areas of marijuana cultivation.
The ministry assesses that small-scale marijuana production (less than 10,000 plants) for domestic sale and use is the only narcotics production within Croatia.
Demand Reduction.
The Ministry of Health, with limited resources, has implemented some demand reduction programs.
The Ministry of Education requires drug education in primary and secondary schools.
The state-run national medical system offers treatment programs for drug users.
There are also several independent drug treatment centers, which focus their efforts on cocaine and heroin treatment.
One such center reported 31 individuals seeking treatment for "angel dust" (PCP) use in 1999, the first such cases reported in Croatia.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
The U.S. continues to urge increased attention by the GOC to drug issues.
The Interior Ministry and U.S. law enforcement agencies cooperated well at the operational level during the year, but training programs for rule-of-law and law enforcement have been limited because of the authoritarian nature of the Croatian Government.
Cyprus
I. Summary
Although there continues to be no evidence of significant narcotics production on Cyprus, there is increasing concern on the island about a perceived increase in usage.
The Government of Cyprus has traditionally adopted a low tolerance attitude toward any use of narcotics by Cypriots and has embarked on a pro-active public affairs strategy to remind Cypriots that narcotics use carries heavy penalties.
Drug traffickers may use Cyprus as a transshipment point because of Cyprus' strategic location and its relatively sophisticated business and communications infrastructure.
A party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, Cyprus strictly enforces tough anti-drug laws, and police and customs authorities maintain excellent relations with United States and other foreign governments.
The Government of Cyprus made progress during 1999 in its efforts to combat money laundering.
The Unit for Combating Money Laundering, which coordinates the Cyprus Government's efforts against such crimes, seized houses, apartments and cars using a 1996 anti-money laundering law.
The Unit recorded its second conviction under the 1996 Law Against Money Laundering and has three pending cases in the local court system.
The Cypriot authorities froze assets valued at more than U.S. $2 million.
The Central Bank issued a comprehensive handbook of its guidance notes to its commercial banks and conducted a special examination of each bank's "know your customer principles" in March and April 1999.
Cypriot officials involved in combating money laundering acquired extensive training in 1999 from the U.S., EU, UK, and others.
Cyprus monitors the importation and exportation of chemicals for local markets.
Cyprus' geographic location and the free-port status of its two main seaports continue to make it an ideal transit country for trade in chemicals and most goods between Europe and the Middle East.
II Status of Country
Cyprus has a small, but growing population of soft-core drug users.
Distribution increased during the summer months in the tourist areas.
The Cypriot authorities aggressively pursue this distribution, as they do illegal cultivation, sale, transport, and financing.
Cyprus attempts interdiction efforts for drugs transiting Cyprus when information is made available.
There is no significant sale or identified financing occurring in Cyprus.
Cypriots themselves do not produce or consume significant quantities of drugs.
The island's strategic location in the Eastern Mediterranean may have served as a convenient stopover for traffickers in the past.
The decline of Cyprus as a major transshipment point for entirely licit cargoes, bound to or from Lebanon and Turkey means that Cyprus is no longer as attractive for traffickers.
Nevertheless, Cyprus offers highly developed business and tourism facilities, a modern telecommunications system, and the fifth largest merchant shipping fleet in the world.
Still low by international standards, drug-related crime has been steadily rising since the 1980's.
III.
Country Action against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
The Unit for Combating Money Laundering has been expanded to 12 members.
It includes three representatives from the Department of Customs, the Police, and the Attorney General's office.
The Attorney General's office provided new office space for the Unit in 1999.
This allowed most of the Unit's members to be co-located for the first time.
The Government of Cyprus amended its monetary declaration law to be in line with the European Union Money Laundering Directive of 1991.
Financial entities are now required to declare transactions above 15,000 Euros (approximately USD 15,000).
In November 1999, The Central Bank consolidated all its previous circulars and guidance in a comprehensive handbook which it issued to all international banking units and administered banking units.
The handbook covered, among other things, customer identification procedures, record keeping procedures and the appointment and duties of money laundering compliance officers.
On the drug enforcement front, Cyprus continued its vigorous efforts against all violators.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
Cyprus aggressively pursues drug seizures, arrests, and prosecutions for drug violations.
* The Unit for Combating Money Laundering recorded its second conviction under the Anti-Money Laundering Law in the spring of 1999.
There are three cases currently pending in the Courts.
The Unit has issued 170 Information Disclosure Orders and the freezing of more than U.S. $15 million in assets since its inception.
* Cyprus focuses on major traffickers when the opportunities are available and readily supports the international community in its efforts.
* There is no production of precursor chemicals in Cyprus, nor is there any indication of illicit diversion.
Precursor chemicals manufactured in Europe do transit Cyprus to third countries.
* Cypriot police are generally effective in their law enforcement efforts; their techniques and capacity remain restricted by budget shortages.
* In 1999, Cypriot law enforcement agencies trained more than 500 police officers in the rules and procedures of the 1996 Law Against Money Laundering.
They also made such training an element in new officer basic training.
* International enforcement cooperation is limited somewhat by the political division of the island into the internationally recognized Republic of Cyprus in the South and the "Turkish Republic of Northern Cyprus" in the North.
The Republic of Cyprus authorities have no working relations with enforcement authorities in the "Turkish Republic of Northern Cyprus (TRNC)."
Turkish Cypriots have their own law enforcement organization, responsible for the investigation of all narcotics-related matters.
These Turkish Cypriot authorities have shown a willingness to pursue narcotics traffickers, and provide assistance when asked by foreign law enforcement authorities.
Corruption.
There is no evidence of senior or other officials facilitating the production, processing, or shipment of drugs.
Agreements and Treaties.
Cyprus is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention and the Council of Europe Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of the proceeds from crime.
A new extradition treaty between the United States and Cyprus entered into force in September 1999.
The U.S. and Cyprus signed a mutual legal assistance treaty in December 1999 and the U.S. plans to submit the treaty to the Senate for advice and consent in 2000.
The USG has concluded a Customs Mutual Assistance Agreement (CMAA) with the Government of Cyprus.
Cultivation/Production.
The only known production is the limited, but increasing, cultivation of cannabis for individual use and, on a smaller scale, for resale.
The only illicitly cultivated controlled substance in Cyprus is cannabis, and this is grown only in small quantities for local consumption.
The Cypriot authorities vigorously pursue this illegal cultivation.
Drug Flow/Transit.
No significant increase in drug flow or transit has been observed over the last year.
Cyprus police believe their efforts in combating drug trafficking have mostly converted Cyprus from a drug transit point to a "broker point" for dealers.
This change is likely also the result of improved conditions in Lebanon.
Lebanese containerized freight now moves directly to third countries without transiting Cyprus.
However, there were occasions in 1999 when kilograms of heroin seized in London were identified as transiting Northern Cyprus from Turkey.
Domestic Programs/Demand Reduction.
Cyprus actively promotes demand reduction programs through the school system and through social organizations.
Drug abuse remains relatively rare in Cyprus.
Hashish is the most commonly encountered drug, followed by heroin and cocaine, all of which are available in most major towns.
Users consist primarily of young people and tourists.
Recent increases in drug use have prompted the government actively to promote demand reduction programs through the school system and social organizations, occasionally with DEA-Nicosia participation.
Drug treatment is available.
Part IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
Cyprus has excellent cooperative relations with its neighbors and Western nations, including the U.S., and is quick to assist when requested.
On 30 June 1998, Cyprus became a member of the international Egmont Group.
This will increase Cyprus' effectiveness in combating money laundering by strengthening its cooperation with other financial intelligence units and by removing past obstacles that prevented the free flow and exchange of information.
One of the highest goals of the U.S. government in Cyprus is the deterrence of money laundering activities on the island.
U.S. support for this goal comes from the top.
The Ambassador and other members of the U.S. Embassy in Nicosia raised the issue repeatedly during the year with key Cyprus Government officials.
Road Ahead.
The USG anticipates continued close cooperation from the Cypriot Office of the Attorney General, the Central Bank, the Cyprus Police and the Customs Authority officials in our drug enforcement and anti-money laundering efforts.
The USG will make every effort to track the influence/effect of organized crime on Cyprus.
The Cyprus Government must heighten its efforts to change the informal code of silence, which predominates within its banking community.
Instead of merely turning questionable deposits away, banks must begin aggressively to report on all such activities.
Czech Republic
I. Summary
The end of Communist rule and the opening of borders a decade ago, coupled with a westward shift in patterns of international trade, resulted in a steady increase in illicit drug trafficking through the Czech Republic.
In the second half of the decade, the Czech Republic itself has become a destination country for illicit narcotics and psychotropic drugs consumption.
Domestically, heroin and pervitine (a synthetic stimulant) are the most abused drugs.
The rise in illicit narcotics activity has led Czech policy in 1998-1999 to shift towards a more repressive rather than preventive orientation.
Amendments to strengthen the 1996 money-laundering law and related changes to the criminal code are before Parliament.
Additional measures such as increasing prison sentences for drug dealers are under consideration.
Czech cooperation with international law enforcement counterparts is excellent and reaping results in large seizures and multilateral arrests.
The Czech Republic is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
The Czech Republic remains a transshipment and stockpile point mainly for heroin from Turkey traveling the traditional Balkan route to Western Europe, and Nigerian marijuana destined for central and northern Europe.
In 1999, with Italy's tightening of border controls to stem the flow of Kosovar refugees, Czech authorities encountered a significant increase in Kosovar-Albanians trafficking heroin through Czech borders.
Colombian and other Latin American cocaine trafficking has continued.
Cocaine is too expensive for most Czech consumers and is used mainly by Western "drug tourists" who transit Czech territory destined for Scandinavia.
Crack cocaine is found in small quantity in the Czech Republic.
There are indications of an emerging trend of amphetamine smuggling to the United States through the Czech Republic.
Czech authorities are abating illicit synthetic drug production by small domestic labs, and intercepting precursor chemicals (most recently from Ukraine) which are diverted from legitimate domestic pharmaceutical production.
III.
Country Actions Against Illicit Drugs in 1999
The Czech government has addressed illicit narcotics abuse with more emphasis on criminal than social and health dimensions.
A law criminalizing narcotics possession for personal use became effective in January 1999.
Czech authorities have implemented the new law on a reasonable basis, focusing their limited resources on enforcement action against major producers and dealers of illegal drugs, although individual growers of marijuana plants face charges under the new law.
In the first ten months of 1999, the Czech Police National Anti-Drug Center (NDAC) submitted 4600 criminal charges for narcotics crimes, of which just 260 were for individual drug possession under the stricter standard of the new law.
Kosovar Albanians, Turks, and Colombians have a strong position as illicit suppliers and generally operate within Czech territory by employing Czech nationals.
As a new development, Russian-speaking organized crime syndicates are attempting to penetrate the Czech illegal narcotics market.
Accomplishments.
The Czech National Anti-Drug Center (NADC) operates in close cooperation with a Czech Customs Unit focused on arms and narcotics smuggling.
In 1999, Czech officials realized significant seizures of heroin destined to northern Europe leading to arrests in multiple countries, predominantly of Czech, Yugoslav/Kosovar and Scandinavian citizens.
A Czech-U.S.- German action completed in early 1999 led to the biggest cocaine seizure (135 kilograms) in the Czech Republic and the elimination of an entire criminal network involving Colombian, Spanish and Russian nationals.
Also in 1999, the Czech NADC located and apprehended the Kosovar Albanian drug boss Prince Dobrosi who had undergone plastic surgery to conceal his identity.
Czech officials extradited him to Norway from where he had escaped a 14 year prison term.
The Czech government secured the extradition of a Czech citizen from Costa Rica for prosecution as a major trafficker.
Czech authorities, including the Financial Analytic Unit (FAU) of the Finance Ministry, record increased reports of suspicious transactions received from the banking, securities and real estate industry.
Thirty of the 200 suspicious reports in 1999 were referred by the FAU to the police for prosecution.
Czech authorities are not readily able to quantify the extent to which the various money-laundering reports are specifically narcotics-related.
The largest money-laundering case intercepted by the FAU in 1999 amounted to U.S. $ 2.2 million dollars, which were the proceeds of cashing counterfeit checks.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
The Czech Police National Anti-Drug Center (NADC) and its Customs partner are among the most effective Czech law enforcement units.
Czech police and Customs cooperation with U.S. counterpart agencies is excellent.
Despite successive years of budget cuts for Czech law enforcement, the NADC was authorized a substantial personnel increase in 1999 to a planned total of seventy agents.
However, budget constraints continue to adversely affect operations.
For example, despite a German Government donation in 1999 of eight vehicles, the NADC total vehicle pool has declined by two service cars.
The NADC anticipates contending with a 27 percent cut in its 2000 budget, compared with the 1999 level.
UN Drug Control Program (UNDCP) funding for the Czech Republic is largely phasing out.
A final 1998-1999 UNDCP grant of U.S. $ 162,000 will help the purchase of communications equipment.
Corruption.
Narcotics-related corruption among Czech public officials is negligible and strongly resisted within NADC ranks.
In July 1999, a local police chief and two police officers were charged with alleged complicity in illegal heroin trade.
The outcome of the prosecution is pending in the backlogged Czech court system.
Agreements and Treaties.
The Czech Republic is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
In November 1999, the Czech Parliament ratified the U.S.-Czech Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty (MLAT).
Both the U.S. and the Czech Republic have ratified the treaty and it is expected to enter into force in early 2000, after the exchange of instruments of ratification.
The USG concluded a Customs Mutual Legal Assistance Agreement (CMAA) with the Government of the Czech Republic in 1993, and terms of the agreement were productively invoked in early 1999.
The Czech Republic is a party to the World Customs Organization's International Convention on Mutual Administrative Assistance for the Prevention, Investigation, and Repression of Customs Offenses (Nairobi Convention), Annex X on Assistance in Narcotics Cases.
Cultivation/Production.
The Czech Agriculture Ministry monitors the cultivation and marketing of opium poppies which are produced for use as poppy seed, a major ingredient of Czech cuisine.
In 1999, poppy production totaled 28 thousand tons, in line with average annual poppy production which ranged from 10 to 25 thousand tons in the past decade.
There is no cultivation of coca or opium.
Marijuana production is negligible and, in 1999 under the new law against personal possession, arrests occurred of individuals with household plants.
Domestic Programs/Demand Reduction.
The Czech government's growing budget deficit and funding cuts assessed for most ministries has led to a second successive year of funding cuts for prevention and education programs.
This is despite the fact that the majority of drug abusers are in the 15-19 age range, with as many as 5 percent of addicts under the age of 15 years.
The age of first time heroin use continues to drop, and alarmingly occurs mostly by intravenous ingestion.
The Czech government finances an extensive network of counseling and health centers readily available on an anonymous basis for drug abuse drop-in and continuing treatment, but budgets allocation lag behind increased demand.
Needle exchange programs are established and well-used.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
Czech law enforcement agencies maintain close and effective operational relationships with U.S. counterparts, especially the Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) and Customs.
Czech Health Ministry officials participate actively in international conferences aimed at improving controls on trade in precursor chemicals and work closely with U.S. DEA regional precursor specialists based in Frankfurt, Germany.
The Road Ahead.
The Czech Education Ministry in 1999 reached agreement with the United States and United Kingdom embassies to cooperate on a demand reduction education program, after several years of negotiation.
Embassy Prague is now providing a grant from the Department of State's Bureau for International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs prior-year funds to the non-profit Czech Center for Conflict Resolution/Partners for Democratic Change to train teachers in demand reduction methods.
In 1998, American specialists collaborated with the British Know-How Fund, the Czech government's National Inter-Ministerial Drug Commission, and the Czech Ministry of Education in the development of a nation-wide drug education curriculum and publication of an instruction manual.
In 2000, about 400 primary and secondary school teachers and district-level anti-drug coordinators will receive practical training in the range of prevention skills outlined in the manual.
By training-the-trainers, the program participants will be well positioned to return to their individual schools to further educate other teachers and administrators in innovative prevention techniques and strategies.
Denmark
I. Summary
Denmark's strategic geographic location and status as northern Europe's primary transportation hub make it an attractive drug transit country.
The Danes cooperate closely with their Scandinavian neighbors and the EU to check the transit of illicit drugs, and Denmark plays an increasingly important role in helping the Baltic States combat narcotics trafficking.
While quantities of drugs seized in Denmark are relatively small, Danish authorities assume that their open border agreements and high volume of international trade allow some drug shipments to transit Denmark undetected.
Within Denmark, heroin use increased dramatically in 1999, while amphetamines and ecstasy remain popular among a growing number of younger Danes.
As a result of the EU requirement that member states establish National Centers for Investigative Support (NCIS), Denmark replaced their National Drug Intelligence Unit (NDIU) with an NCIS.
Although the name has changed, the mandate remains the same.
Denmark is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Drug traffickers utilize Denmark's excellent transportation network to bring illicit drugs to Denmark for domestic use and for transshipment to other Nordic countries.
There is evidence that drugs from the Baltic countries, and central Europe pass through Denmark en route to western Europe states and the U.S., although the amount flowing to the U.S. remains relatively small.
Kosovar Albanians are the newest actors in the European drug trade.
Their activities in Denmark have caused heroin seizures to increase over 500 percent - from 18.1 kilos last year to over 110 kilos in 1999.
III.
Country Action Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
Denmark complies with the requirements of all major international narcotics-related conventions and agreements of which it is a member.
Denmark also contributes toward the development of common counternarcotics standards within the international organizations of which it is a member.
Denmark continues to provide training, financing and coordination assistance to the three Baltic countries (Estonia, Latvia and Lithuania) principally to improve interdiction efforts.
As part of the Politi Told Nordic (PTN - Nordic Police Customs) agreement, Denmark has a Customs officer stationed in Lithuania.
Danish authorities view narcotics-related money laundering as a manageable problem despite Denmark's role as a major financial center.
Banking procedures are transparent and are subject to government review and high taxation, which discourages prospective money launderers and minimizes the likelihood of improper use of the banking system.
Accomplishments.
Danish police continued their aggressive counternarcotics efforts in 1999.
Danish law permits forfeiture and seizure of assets in drug-related criminal cases.
Authorities strongly uphold existing asset seizure and forfeiture laws and cooperate with foreign authorities in such cases.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
Danish cocaine and amphetamine seizures were down in 1999, reflecting increasingly effective narcotics control efforts.
Through September 1999, Denmark confiscated 15 kilos of cocaine (down from 29.1) and 8.5 kilos of amphetamines (down from 16.4).
On the other hand, seizures of heroin and hashish have risen dramatically.
So far in 1999, 110 kilos of heroin have been seized (up from 18.1), including 64 kilos from a German national, arrested in August, who was working for a group of Kosovar Albanians.
In April 1999, 12 tons of hashish was seized on board the M/V Kvedarna, a Lithuanian registered ship run by criminals with ties to Danish and Russian organized crime.
Denmark continues to bolster the interdiction capabilities of the Baltic States.
One of the bases of operations is on the Baltic island of Bornholm, Denmark's easternmost territory, where a continuing project involving the customs services and police, in cooperation with the Danish Navy, work to interdict narcotics, other smuggled contraband and illegal migrants.
Corruption.
The USG has no knowledge of any involvement by Danish government officials in drug production or sale, or in the laundering of their proceeds.
Agreements and Treaties.
Denmark is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention and adopted the enabling legislation for the European Drug Unit (EDU) in 1997.
The USG has concluded a Customs Mutual Assistance Agreement (CMAA) with the Government of Denmark.
Denmark participates in the Dublin Group and EU meetings on related topics.
Drug Flow/Transit.
According to law enforcement officials in Denmark, drugs transit Denmark on their way to neighboring European nations and, in small quantities, to the U.S.
The abilities of the Danish authorities to interdict this flow are slightly hampered by its EU membership and its open border policies.
Denmark's interagency group responsible for monitoring the distribution of precursor chemicals reported no infractions in 1999.
In 1998, U.S. authorities criticized Danish customs for lax enforcement on precursor exports to Latin America.
Since that time the Danes have become extremely responsive and proactive on monitoring exports.
Demand Reduction.
Denmark's Ministry of Health continues to estimate that there are between 10,000 and 12,000 drug users in Denmark, but this low tally includes only those people who are officially registered as addicts with the government and enrolled in government programs.
The country maintains an extensive counternarcotics education program in schools and youth centers.
Drug addicts are treated in a large number of institutions throughout Denmark.
In addition to in-patient care at hospitals, out-patient care is available at hospitals, youth crisis centers, and special out-patient clinics.
These programs are free of charge to Danish residents.
Since 1996 the government funded programs which involve the treatment of addicts through a medically supervised reduction program as an alternative to serving prison sentences.
The debate on a proposal to permit doctors to supply some addicts with heroin continues, but support for the proposal is waning.
The Road Ahead.
In the coming year, the Danish authorities hope to increase their seizures of ecstasy and work closely with the Norwegian authorities in interdiction efforts.
The Danes will also continue to build on the PTN agreement to increase information sharing and cooperation against narcotics trafficking.
Estonia
I. Summary
Seizures of illicit drugs, increasing numbers of serious crimes committed by drug abusers, and significant growth in the domestic demand for hard drugs all illustrate Estonia's expanding involvement in the narcotics trade.
The Government of Estonia (GOE) has acknowledged the seriousness of the problem and through strong anti-drug legislation passed in 1997 is confronting the consumption and trafficking of illegal drugs.
Although a party to other UN counternarcotics conventions and protocols, accession to the 1988 UN Drug Convention has been delayed pending revision to current Estonian law.
The extent of the money laundering problem in Estonia is unknown.
The recently enacted law on money laundering should enable officials to begin addressing this issue.
II.
Status of Country
Estonia's geographical position, on the edge of the Baltic Sea between Europe and Russia, makes it an attractive transit area for illegal drugs.
The country's growing economic integration with the world economy has attracted millions of tourists.
Frequent passenger ferries, linking Estonia to Finland and Sweden, disembark thousands of tourists at a time on the docks, making border control difficult.
In addition to package-laden tourist ferries, small boats and freight vehicles are used for drug trafficking.
Since the mid-1990's when Estonian law enforcement clamped down on the illegal metal and wood trades, organized crime has increasingly turned to narcotics trafficking.
In one incident in October 1999, the drug squad of Tallinn police arrested 20 members of a drug trafficking gang which had close ties to organized crime.
The total amount of narcotics seized during the investigation ran into kilos.
According to the counter-narcotics department, Estonians have been charged with organizing illegal drug shipments that never enter Estonia, but are shipped between other countries.
In separate incidents, two boats formally owned by Estonian resident Vassili Trofimov were seized with drug contraband.
The Latvian-flagged "Nemo" was seized in France with 23.5 tons of marihuana and the St. Vincent-flagged "Tammsaare" was captured near the Canary Islands with 97 kilos of cocaine and 280 kilos of heroine on board.
III.
Country Action Against Drugs in 1999
Law Enforcement Efforts.
One police officer in each police prefecture throughout the country has been assigned specific responsibility for drug matters.
The coordinating body for the involved law enforcement agencies is the Counter-narcotics Office of the Central Criminal Police.
Forty-five full-time counter narcotics officers are assigned to the Tallinn-based Central Criminal Police Bureau, compared to 33 in 1998.
A special 25-member counter-narcotics team in Tallinn regularly patrols the streets, high-crime areas, and youth nightspots.
In 1999, drug-sniffing dogs began accompanying these team members during their rounds.
A separate counter-drug office was established in Tartu, Estonia's second largest city.
Another office was opened in Narva, located on the Estonian-Russian border, which is considered to have the second most serious drug problem after Tallinn.
Corruption.
The U.S. Government (USG) is not aware of any narcotic related official corruption having taken place in 1999.
Agreements and Treaties.
Estonia's law on narcotics and psychotropic substances is the legal basis for controlling drugs, their precursor chemicals, and the trafficking of both, and deals with the treatment and rehabilitation of drug abusers.
The law took effect on November 1, 1997.
Estonia also aspires to meet all the requirements of the United Nations drug conventions.
Estonia is a party to the 1961 UN Single Convention as amended by the 1972 Protocol and the 1971 UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances.
A working group has been set up within the Ministry of Internal Affairs to work for the accession to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
Certain parts of current Estonian law conflict with the 1988 UN Drug Convention, and the GOE must first amend the Credit Institutions Act, the penal code and the penal procedure code before adopting it.
On April 2, 1998, the United States and Estonia signed a Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty, but it has not yet entered into force.
In addition, there is a 1924 U.S.- Estonia extradition treaty and a 1935 supplemental treaty that is still in force.
Cultivation and Production.
While the cold weather precludes Estonia from becoming an important source of narcotic crops, small amounts of opium poppies and cannabis have been reportedly cultivated.
Primarily for their own use, addicts convert poppy straw into an injectable acetlyated opium solution known as "liquid heroin".
Estonian authorities as well as foreign experts have reported that the necessary precursor chemicals and technical expertise are present in Estonia to allow for the clandestine manufacture of amphetamine.
Drug Flow and Transit.
The annual illegal drug trade in Estonia amounts to several hundred million U.S. dollars.
Amphetamines and other stimulants are imported from Poland, Belarus, Ukraine and, possibly, Russia.
Estonian dealers and traffickers also have established direct contact with cocaine sources in Latin America, including Colombia and Venezuela.
In 1999, 192 drug-related crimes were registered, a 16 percent increase over the same period attributable not only to growing drug abuse, but also to the expanding expertise of law enforcement officials.
A separate counter-narcotics unit is functioning under the National Customs Board.
Eight border guards have been trained to work with drug detecting dogs.
The Estonian Customs Board has entered into a cooperation agreement with three private freight-forwarding companies to halt the expansion of drug trafficking both into and through Estonia.
This agreement is directly responsible for the arrests.
Demand Reduction.
By international standards Estonia's narcotics trade situation is not grave.
While hard figures are not available, the estimated number of drug abusers is about 12,000.
According to Estonian police officials, the increased use of MDMA is one of their most pressing concerns.
Law enforcement officials report that MDMA is available for purchase in almost every bar and nightclub in the capital city of Tallinn and has become the drug of choice among the 15 to 25 year old age group.
The growing demand for cocaine and heroine, recently unknown in Estonia, implies that unless properly reined in, narcotics-related problems will begin to pose a threat to the society.
Estonian non-governmental organizations (NGOs) and youth organizations are also actively participating in counter-narcotics efforts, with a series of anti-drug advertising campaigns, educational exhibitions, lectures and video seminars designed both for students and teachers.
Drug related topics are a compulsory health education subject of Estonia's basic and secondary education state study program.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation U.S. training programs during 1999 were limited.
One Estonian policeman traveled to the U.S. for counternarcotics training via a U.S. Information Service program and the USG again provided Estonia with several narcotics test kits.
In October, GOE officials participated in a USG sponsored regional money laundering seminar in Lithuania.
The Road Ahead.
In 2000, the USG intends to offer Estonia additional training dealing with drug enforcement and with organized and financial crime.
A regional counter- narcotics seminar will be held in Riga.
Another priority will be to continue encouraging the GOE to become party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
Finland
I. Summary
Finland is not a significant narcotics trafficking or money laundering country.
However, drug abuse has increased steadily during the 1990s, and drug-related crimes have increased nearly four-fold during the decade (including domestic marijuana cultivation, mostly for personal use.)
Some criminal groups in Finland, with connections to Baltic and Russian organized crime, are used to distribute narcotics to the domestic market.
An efficient and professional law enforcement community nonetheless vigorously combats drug abuse and narcotics trafficking, regularly intercepting major shipments and denying traffickers an easy transit point and market.
Effective controls on the Russian border have prevented the overland route from developing into a trafficking conduit.
The police are concerned, however, about heroin and amphetamine shipments arriving from the St. Petersburg area and the Baltic countries, respectively.
Finland is a major donor to UNDCP, and is active in counternarcotics initiatives within the European Union.
Finland is party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Finland remains an insignificant country with respect to narcotics production, trafficking, cultivation, and production/diversion of precursor chemicals.
Finnish law enforcement authorities effectively counter the threat of trafficking from abroad and energetically combat domestic abuse.
Estonia, the Netherlands, Russia, and Spain are Finland's principal sources of illicit drugs.
Hashish is the drug most often seized by the Finnish police.
Trafficking in highly-purified amphetamines from Estonia, including the drug "ecstasy," is a continuing concern for Finland.
According to the police, these drugs are not generally manufactured in the Baltic region but are produced elsewhere in eastern Europe.
Finnish authorities affirm that their land border with Russia is well-guarded by both sides and that the border has not become a significant narcotics transit route.
They express continuing concern, however, about a fairly recent development: the arrival in southern Finland of high-quality, powerful heroin ("white heroin") from the St. Petersburg area.
Despite declines in the amount of heroin seized during the first nine months of 1999 and 1998 as compared to corresponding periods in 1997 and 1996, the Finns say the stronger heroin being intercepted is increasingly intended for the local Finnish market and is not merely, as in the past, transiting Finland.
A Finnish police liaison officer assigned to the Finnish Consulate in St. Petersburg works with the Russian authorities to combat this and other threats to Finland.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs
Policy Initiatives.
In late 1998, the Finnish government released a comprehensive policy statement on drugs.
This statement clearly articulates Finland's policy on drugs--complete prohibition.
It reminds citizens that all narcotics manufacturing and trafficking are crimes punishable under Finnish law.
Accomplishments.
Finland enacted legislation criminalizing money laundering in 1994.
The police do not yet have final money laundering statistics for 1999.
However, they estimate that they will have investigated fewer cases of narcotics-related money laundering in 1999 than during the previous year (ten fairly minor cases in 1998).
During 1999, Finland maintained its staffing of one customs officer and one national police officer at Europol's European Drugs Unit (EDU) in the Hague.
The Finnish authorities believe that their presence at EDU enhances their domestic counternarcotics effort.
Law Enforcement.
For 1999, the police estimate that they will have investigated approximately the same number of cases of indoor cannabis cultivation as in 1998 (190 cases), extrapolating from half-year statistics.
During 1999, there were no seizures of indigenously cultivated opiates, no recorded diversions of precursor chemicals, and no detection of illicit amphetamine, cocaine, or LSD laboratories in Finland.
Beginning in the mid-1980s, limited police resources focused law enforcement authorities on major narcotics cases and on significant traffickers, somewhat to the detriment of street-level patrols, investigations, and prosecutions.
The police say the result of this change has been to lessen drug users' fear of arrest and to make "recreational" drug use more widespread.
According to the police, the steady rise in drug use during the 1990s has led to a situation in which the number of drug offenders greatly exceeds the resources deployed to combat illegal drugs.
The police report that, following the release in late 1998 of the government's policy statement on drugs, greater resources have been devoted to combating drugs at the street-level.
There are approximately 24 local crime groups in Finland, some of which have connections with organized crime in the Baltic's and Russia.
These groups are used by organized crime as facilitators and distributors of narcotics to the Finnish market.
Corruption.
There have been no arrests or prosecutions of public officials charged with corruption or related offenses linked to narcotics money in Finnish history.
Agreements/Treaties.
Finland is party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, and its legislation is consistent with all the Convention's goals.
Finland has extradition treaties with most countries, but seldom extradites Finnish nationals to other countries.
A number of Finns have been returned to Finland for prosecution, however.
Extradition legislation now before parliament would make it easier to extradite Finnish suspects to other countries.
Finland is a member of the major donors' group within the Dublin Group.
The vast majority of its financial and other assistance to drug-producing and transit countries has been via the UNDCP.
Finland has bilateral narcotics agreements with Estonia.
Cultivation/Production.
Indoor cannabis cultivation is a fairly new phenomenon in Finland, according to the police.
While most home-grown cannabis is for private consumption, some is intended for trafficking.
Finland's climate and short growing season make natural cultivation of cannabis and opiates almost impossible.
Local cannabis cultivation involves small numbers of plants in individual homes using artificial lighting.
The distribution of the 22 key precursor chemicals used for cocaine, amphetamine, and heroin production is tightly controlled.
Drug Flow/Transit.
The police confiscated a record amount of hashish (100 kilograms) in April 1999.
In October 1999, the police seized significant amounts of the amphetamine "ecstasy" in what may be the largest case ever of ecstasy smuggling to Finland.
Domestic Programs/Demand Reduction.
Existing Finnish legislation covers the distribution, sale, and transport of narcotic substances, as well as extradition, law enforcement, transit cooperation, precursor chemical control, and demand reduction.
It also criminalizes abuse of illicit drugs with sentences of up to two years in prison.
The police believe it is imperative to criminalize the system effectively in order to send a strong deterrent message to the "demand" end.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives
U.S. Policies.
In January 2000 Finland will host a two-week DEA regional drug enforcement seminar in Helsinki.
The DEA-conducted seminar will bring together participants from Finland, Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania.
Bilateral Cooperation.
Finland does not have mutual legal assistance, precursor chemical, or money laundering treaties with the United States.
Multilateral treaties, including membership in the UNDCP, constitute the basis of Finnish cooperation with the U.S. on counternarcotics initiatives.
Finland's multilateral commitments cover the spectrum of law enforcement, investigative, and jurisdictional cooperation.
The Road Ahead.
Draft legislation has been sent to the Finnish parliament which would increase the law enforcement community's ability to pursue criminals using additional investigative tools undercover investigations, and authorization to make controlled "buys," etc. (wiretapping was authorized in 1995.)
The police say they are confident that parliament will approve this legislation next year.
Following the issuance of the government's comprehensive policy statement on drugs in late 1998, the police have been preparing a study based on the new drug policy that advocates allocating greater resources to counternarcotics efforts.
France
I. Summary
France is an important transit country to other European countries, particularly for heroin originating in southwest Asia, cocaine originating in South America, cannabis originating in Morocco, and ecstasy originating in the Netherlands.
Although heroin use appeared to decline, it continued to be a concern to French officials because of its health and social impact.
Cocaine consumption increased, and cannabis (primarily hashish) consumption continued to be a problem, particularly among young people, where the number of users continued to grow.
A major concern of French officials was the rising number of users of ecstasy and the large quantities of this synthetic drug entering France.
Like other European countries, France increasingly faces the problem of "polytoxicomanie," or multiple drug addiction.
France is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
French government narcotics data for 1998, released in the spring of 1999, show that the number of persons arrested for trafficking in heroin and cannabis remained significantly greater than for any other drug.
The 1998 data also shows arrests for cocaine/crack trafficking and use up the third year in a row, but the amount of heroin seized and the number of arrests for heroin use/resale both fell significantly, indicating that actual use of heroin was also down for the third year in a row.
Ecstasy and cannabis continued to be the most widely abused drugs in France, and cocaine use increased as more cocaine from South America entered the country.
Reports in 1999 of large ecstasy and cocaine seizures indicate that the amount of ecstasy and cocaine seized in 1999 was even greater than in 1998.
III.
Country Action Against Drugs
Policy Initiatives.
In March 1999, France adopted a new law on drug use in sports, creating an independent administrative council for prevention of drug abuse in sports, "le Conseil de Prevention et de Lutte contre le Dopage" (CPLD), with authority to require sports federations to test athletes and discipline violators.
Under the law, supplying doping products to athletes is a crime, but use is not.
Sports federations remain responsible for imposing disciplinary sanctions against users.
France's drug control agency, "la Mission Interministerielle de Lutte contre la Drogue et la Toxicomanie" (MILDT), is the focal point of French national drug control policy and coordinates among the many ministries involved.
In June the Government of France (GOF) adopted a new national drug policy based on the approach proposed in 1998 by the MILDT, which includes a three-year plan of action (1999-2001) to integrate illicit drugs into France's anti-narcotics programs efforts against the abuse of tobacco, alcohol, and prescription drugs.
The plan focuses on prevention, including health, welfare and education programs, while reaffirming the role of law enforcement activities.
Accomplishments.
France has stabilized and perhaps even reduced the number of heroin users.
Having adopted a new national drug policy, the GOF began to implement a three-year national drug control strategy.
French law enforcement officials continue to interdict and seize large quantities of narcotics destined for or transiting France.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
French counternarcotics authorities are efficient and effective.
In 1999 French authorities made three record seizures of narcotics.
In February, French officials seized 1,270 kilograms of cocaine, the largest recorded seizure of cocaine in France, in the village of Tigery.
The cocaine originated in Colombia and arrived in France by ship after being repackaged in Guadeloupe.
In the same month officials made the largest seizure of cannabis in French history, approximately 23,235 kilograms, from a fishing vessel in the English Channel.
The third record seizure took place in March, when 584,000 ecstasy tablets were seized on a truck which entered from Belgium and was about to depart for England.
In 1998, heroin seizures (amounting to 343 kilograms) decreased by 17.25 percent, with the number of arrests for use/resale down 37.16 percent.
At the same time, however, seizure figures for other drugs increased: cannabis by 1.05 percent (55,698 kilograms), cocaine by 24.47 (1,050 kilograms), LSD by 212.22 percent (18,580 doses), and ecstasy by 474.15 percent (1,142,226 doses).
Corruption.
Narcotics-related corruption among French public officials is not a problem.
The USG is not aware of any involvement by senior officials in the production or distribution of drugs or in the laundering of drug proceeds.
Agreements and Treaties.
France is party to the 1961 UN Single Convention and its 1972 Protocol, the 1971 UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances and the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
The U.S. and France have narcotics-related agreements, including a 1971 agreement on coordinating action against illicit trafficking.
In 1996 the two countries signed a new extradition treaty to replace a 1911 treaty and a 1971 supplementary convention currently in effect.
The U.S. ratified the new extradition treaty in 1998; France has not yet ratified it.
As a participant in the G-8's Lyon Group of senior experts on transnational organized crime, France has modeled its handling of extradition issues on "best practices" for countries that do not extradite their own nationals.
The U.S. and France signed a mutual legal assistance treaty (MLAT) in 1998 but it has not yet been ratified by either party.
The U.S. has a customs mutual assistance agreement (CMAA) with the France.
GOF officials participate in international multilateral drug control efforts, including UNDCP, the Financial Action Task Force (FATF), and the Dublin Group.
In 1998, France was the ninth largest donor to the UNDCP, giving 8 million francs (approximately $1.3 million), with particular emphasis on judicial assistance, border controls in southwest Asia, and money laundering.
Cultivation/Production.
French authorities believe the cultivation and production of illicit drugs is not a problem in France.
France cultivates opium poppies for medical use and produces amphetamines.
It reports its production of both products to the International Narcotics Control Board (INCB) and cooperates with the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) to monitor and control those products.
Drug Flow/Transit.
An important transshipment point for illicit drugs to other European countries, in 1999 France received most of the heroin from southwest Asia, whether consumed in France or transiting to other Western European countries, via Turkey, Iran and the Balkans.
New routes for transporting heroin from southwest Asia to Europe are developing through central Asia and Russia.
French authorities believe that only a minor amount of heroin from Colombia entered France.
France is a principal transit route for Moroccan cannabis (hashish) to European markets, and for South American cocaine to destinations in Europe.
Most of the South American cocaine entering France comes through Spain and Portugal.
West African drug traffickers also use France as a transshipment point for heroin and cocaine, moving heroin from both southwest and southeast Asia (primarily Burma), and to the U.S. through west Africa and France, with a back-haul of cocaine from South America to France through the U.S. and west Africa.
Law enforcement officials believe west African traffickers stockpile heroin and cocaine in Africa before shipping it to final destinations.
Most of the ecstasy in or transiting France is produced in the Netherlands, Poland, Spain, and the U.K.
Domestic Programs.
MILDT coordinates France's demand reduction programs, targeting target government officials, counselors, teachers, and medical personnel.
The GOF continued its experimental methadone treatment program.
Public debate continued concerning decriminalization of cannabis, but the GOF remained opposed to any change in the 1970 drug law that criminalizes all uses of illicit substances, including cannabis.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
Counternarcotics law enforcement cooperation between the U.S. and France continued to be excellent.
In October, U.S. and French narcotics law enforcement officials met in Sicily for a four-day conference with their Italian and Canadian counterparts to discuss issues of mutual concern.
The sharing of seized and forfeited assets between the U.S. and France, in cases involving international counternarcotics cooperation, is handled on a case by case basis.
The Road Ahead.
The U.S. will continue its cooperation with France on all counternarcotics fronts, including multilateral efforts such as the Dublin Group and UNDCP.
The U.S. will continue to seek to conclude a bilateral counternarcotics maritime agreement for the French Caribbean with France.
Georgia
I. Summary
Georgia is a secondary transit route for narcotics flowing from Central Asia to Europe.
The potential for Georgia to become an important narcotics transit route in the future is exacerbated by the lack of control the government exercises over some of its borders and territory.
Despite recent efforts at reform and personnel changes, law enforcement agencies remain overstaffed, under-equipped, poorly paid, and have a reputation for corruption.
In response to Government of Georgia (GOG) requests, the United States Government (USG) is providing training and equipment for the border guards and customs officials.
Georgia is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention and is working with the UN Drug Control Program (UNDCP).
II.
Status of Country
Georgia is presently a secondary transit route for heroin smuggled from Afghanistan to Europe and morphine base, also from Afghanistan, being transported to Turkey.
Given Georgia's geographic location and its ambition to be a key element in a future overland trade corridor between Europe and Asia, there is a possibility it could also emerge as a major drug route.
Local involvement in drug trafficking remains limited, but cigarette, fuel and alcohol smuggling are major illegal activities in Georgia.
Interdiction efforts are hampered by Georgia's lack of control of all its territory and its borders, some of which are under separatist control.
Border guards and customs officials are poorly paid and, despite recent personnel changes, the latter service is especially liable to corruption.
III.
Country Action Against Drugs In 1999
Policy Initiatives. counternarcotics efforts are coordinated under an inter-agency group chaired by the Ministry of Interior (MOI) with the Ministry of State Security (MSS) as Deputy Chair.
The interagency group did not undertake any significant counternarcotics policy initiatives in 1999, in large part due to the lead agencies being fully tasked for other priorities involving Georgian national security.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
Drug seizures and arrests in 1999 were greater than in 1998.
Despite a growing awareness of the dangers of increased narcotics transiting, all of the relevant law enforcement agencies in Georgia suffer from a lack of financial resources.
Their personnel are under-equipped and poorly trained.
Command lines are vague and these organizations are vastly over-staffed.
Corruption.
Corruption is a significant problem within Georgia's law enforcement agencies.
Government officials generally do not encourage or facilitate illegal narcotic activity, though a number have been involved in the smuggling of cigarettes and alcohol.
Georgia's anti-corruption efforts are hampered by the widespread acceptance of corruption within Georgian society.
Despite numerous investigations and firings, petty corruption on the part of lower level government officials is still widely tolerated as an inevitable consequence of economic hardship and subsistence salaries, often unpaid for months at a time.
Customs officials lack proper training and are easily corruptible.
Although the head of the Customs Service is appointed by the President, other positions are reportedly purchased.
Agreements and Treaties.
The Government of Georgia has no counternarcotics agreements with the United States.
Georgia has been a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention since January 1998.
Georgia is also a party to the Council of Europe Prisoner Transfer Treaty.
Apart from a cooperation agreement between Georgian and Turkish Interior Ministries, there are no formal mechanisms to exchange counternarcotics information.
Cultivation and Production.
Estimates by the GOG on the extent of narcotics cultivation in Georgia are unreliable and do not include those areas of the country outside the central government's control.
Given the small amount of low-grade marijuana grown mainly in the foothills of the Caucasus mountains, largely for domestic use, Georgia is not demonstrably a significant producer of narcotics.
Although Georgia has the technical potential to produce precursor chemicals, it is has no known capacity for presently producing significant quantities.
Drug Flow/Transit.
The government has no reliable statistics on the volume of drugs transiting Georgia.
The central government only recently has assumed control from the Russians over the borders on the territory it does control and it still lacks effective control over other parts of its borders.
Demand Reduction.
There are approximately 11,000 drug addicts of all sorts in Georgia, according to MOI estimates.
The national program prepared by the MOI's anti-narcotics unit is comprehensive; however, program implementation has been constrained due to a lack of resources.
Besides law enforcement activities, the government's strategy involves the treatment of addicts and the education of young people as keys to the long-term reduction of domestic drug use.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
The USG has dedicated $16.5 million in fiscal year 2000 to the Georgian Law Enforcement Assistance and Border Security Program.
This program will assist the GOG in developing the capabilities of its border guards and customs officials to help it assume effective control of its borders.
In October 1999, a counternarcotics component of this program was conducted by DEA and U.S. Customs to train joint classes of border guards and customs officers in contraband enforcement and the use of narcotic test kits.
Upon completion of the training, two hundred test kits were divided equally between the two departments.
The Road Ahead.
Corruption in Georgian law enforcement agencies makes it unlikely that counternarcotics efforts will become effective in the near future.
Without radical reform and extensive personnel changes, the effect of financial and technical assistance from the U.S. and the international community will be largely nullified.
Any assistance to Georgian law enforcement, including counternarcotics, must include provisions for these reforms and must be closely monitored for progress.
Germany
I. Summary
Located in the center of Europe, Germany is a significant crossroads for drug trafficking.
Germany continues to be a major consumer of illicit drugs, though 10-month figures for 1999 indicate a slight decline in the number of first-time hard drug users.
Heroin, ecstasy, and marijuana are the most abused illegal drugs.
A 316-kilogram seizure of heroin in February was the largest quantity of that drug ever seized in Germany.
Turkey continues to be Germany's primary source of heroin moving it via the traditional Balkan and northern Balkan land routes.
Ecstasy smuggling to the United States through Germany is on the rise.
Germany has criminalized money laundering but the law's reporting mechanisms remain a drawback.
Germany is party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Drug couriers from around the world travel to or through Germany via its major airports at Frankfurt and Duesseldorf and seaports such as Hamburg and Bremen on the North Sea and Rostok on the Baltic Sea.
Germany acts as a major transit point for heroin destined for the European market.
Turkish traffickers remain the most significant heroin trafficking group.
Colombia remains the main source of cocaine transiting Germany.
Police report that smuggling from Venezuela has decreased.
Germany is the world's leading manufacturer of pharmaceuticals, making it a target for precursor chemical diversions.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Under the ruling coalition between the Social Democrats and the Greens, coordination of drug policy was transferred from the interior ministry to the health ministry late in 1998.
This signified a change in emphasis: drug use and drug problems now are to be approached more as social and health concerns rather than criminal problems that require punishment.
State Secretary Christa Nickels, who is in charge of drug issues in the health ministry, is focusing on prevention efforts and raising awareness of drug addiction as a sickness.
She recently announced the formation of an independent addiction and drug commission to advise her.
A public media campaign on drug prevention "to make children strong" is in the works.
The Bundestag (parliament) is now discussing the establishment of so-called "fixerstuben" that would provide controlled environments, or 'safe havens' that administer drug paraphernalia (clean needles etc.) for addicts.
Certain "fixerstuben" also administer methadone programs.
U.S. law enforcement agencies report that the changes have not reduced Germany's efforts to fight international drug trafficking.
Germany contributed U.S. $ 4.2 million in 1998 to the UN drug control program.
Due to federal budget restrictions, that amount was reduced to between U.S. $ 700,000 and 800,000 in 1999.
Most of the funds are earmarked for alternative development programs that assist small farmers in Bolivia to develop alternative crops to coca.
Accomplishments.
Through October 1999, police have seized six illegal laboratories used for the production of synthetic drugs.
For the first time, an ecstasy laboratory was discovered in one of former East German states - Saxony anhalt.
The substances seized would have produced 40,000 ecstasy tablets.
Almost half the ecstasy tablets seized in the first half of 1999 were destined for the United States.
Last year, Germany added khat and mushrooms containing psilocybine to its list of illegal drugs.
Through October of 1999, police seized 3959.8 kilograms of khat (primarily from Somalians) and 24.8 kilograms of mushrooms.
Both narcotics were primarily brought into Germany from the Netherlands (where khat is not considered a narcotic).
Heroin seizures were on the rise in 1999, in part as the result of a February seizure of 316 kilograms of heroin in Frankfurt an der Oder in the state of Brandenburg.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
At the state and federal levels, German law enforcement efforts are effective and cooperation with U.S. counterparts is excellent.
Corruption.
Isolated cases of corruption may occur but it is not a major problem in Germany.
The government does not encourage or facilitate the production or distribution of illicit drugs.
Agreements and Treaties.
Germany has been a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention since 1993.
Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty (MLAT) negotiations between the U.S. and Germany are active and moving toward completion.
The USG has concluded a Customs Mutual Assistance Agreement (CMAA) with the Government of Germany.
Cultivation/Production.
Police occasionally discover marijuana plants cultivated for personal use, but there is no large-scale cultivation of any type of drug in Germany.
Drug Flow/Transit.
The numerous transshipments of drugs through Germany remain a cause for concern.
However, U.S. law enforcement agencies report no grand initiatives on this issue by Germany during its presidency of the Schengen countries and the European Union.
Turkey remains the major country of origin of heroin passing through Germany trafficked by Turks, Germans, Italians, Moroccans, and Yugoslavs.
Most cocaine seizures involved drugs from Colombia, though other countries of origin include Costa Rica, Nicaragua, the Netherlands and Brazil.
Domestic Programs/Demand Reduction.
It will be some time before efforts to combat drug use through a new emphasis on prevention, as is the focus of the Health Ministry, can be assessed.
IV.
U. S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
German law enforcement agencies work closely and effectively with their U.S. counterparts - particularly the Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) - in narcotics-related cases.
They routinely cooperate in joint investigations.
This year, DEA and German law enforcement agencies cooperated to counter the surge in ecstasy smuggling to the U.S. Methods including controlled deliveries in the U.S. resulted in the confiscation of 160 kilograms of ecstasy and 20 arrests.
The DEA reported cooperation in two cases in which German law enforcement agencies would have been eligible for the sharing of confiscated assets valued at U.S. $ 60,000.
But Germany has no mechanism for its law enforcement agencies to accept seized assets.
Close cooperation to curb money laundering continues between DEA, the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI), the Internal Revenue Service, the U.S. Customs Service and their German counterparts.
The Road Ahead.
The U.S. mission in Germany will continue to encourage conclusion of an MLAT, to urge the strengthening of money laundering laws and to call for greater ease in the official flow of information.
U.S. law enforcement agencies intend to develop their newly established ties with police in the eastern states.
Greece
I. Summary
Greece is an important "gateway" country in the transit of illicit drugs.
Narcotics flow into Western Europe both through Greece's porous marine borders and through land borders with neighboring countries.
Heroin and hashish enter Greece via Turkey, while cannabis and other drugs enter via Albania, Bulgaria and FYROM.
Greek authorities report that drug abuse, particularly of heroin, is increasing.
The country has the second highest rate of increase in drug overdose deaths in Europe.
Local U.S. authorities report an excellent working relationship with Greek law enforcement agencies.
The government of Greece (GOG) is an active member of international anti-drug and anti-money laundering organizations such as the Financial Action Task Force (FATF) and the Dublin Group, in which its representative chairs the Balkans/Near East regional working group.
The GOG signed the Southeast European Cooperative Initiative (SECI) anti-crime initiative and plans to participate in the work of the regional anti-crime center in Bucharest, including a specialized task force on counternarcotics.
Greece is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Greece's geography, particularly its extensive coastline and numerous islands, its merchant marine (largest in the world), and its membership in the European Union make it a favored drug transshipment route to Western Europe.
Two major Balkan drug routes pass through Greece: from Turkey through Greece and Albania to Italy, and from Turkey through Greece to Bulgaria and on to central and Western Europe.
The domestic market for illicit drugs is growing, particularly for heroin.
A recent study by the University of Athens found that the use of narcotics tripled in the last 15 years.
Greek officials in charge of counternarcotics policy estimated the number of persons in Greece using heroin on a regular basis at approximately 40,000, an estimated 90 percent of the heroin addicts using it intravenously.
Other drugs used include cocaine, LSD, ecstasy, barbiturates, amphetamines, and locally grown marijuana.
Academic sources estimated the average age for first time marijuana use to be 13 years old.
Solvents are the most widely used substances among high school students (6.5 percent in 1993 and 13.7 percent among students aged 15-16 in 1998).
While not a major producer, supplier, or transshipment point for precursor chemicals, Greece has a special customs unit to track and investigate chemical imports and exports.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
The Ministers of Health and Justice approved the extension of the government's network of methadone treatment, in addition to two methadone treatment centers already in Athens and in two in Thessaloniki, to several other major cities in Greece.
OKANA, the Ministry of Health's agency for combating narcotics use, treats approximately 650 addicts at the four existing methadone treatment centers and has 1,800 people on its waiting list.
It also runs a needle exchange program; syringes are inexpensive and readily available in pharmacies.
(Greece has the lowest prevalence of HIV infections in Europe, around four percent.)
The Ministry of Justice, with OKANA and the Ministry of Health, undertook the creation of a treatment facility for prison inmates addicted to drugs.
The center, to be located in Avlona (Thiva), is in the process of recruiting its 120-person staff.
Accomplishments.
The Financial Crimes Enforcement Unit (SDOE) of the Ministry of Finance has participated in a number of narcotics interception operations since it was activated in 1987.
In May 1999, after a 10-month investigation, the U.S. Drug Enforcement Agency (DEA), working with the Hellenic National Police (HNP), SDOE and Hellenic Coast Guard seized about four tons of cocaine, 4.5 million dollars, and arrested 16 suspects.
Greek authorities' valuable assistance to DEA also led to the arrest of several high-level Colombian traffickers based in Barranquilla and Panama.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
The Central Narcotics Council, composed of representatives from the Ministries of Public Order, Finance, and Merchant Marine, coordinates Greece's drug enforcement activities.
Cooperation between U.S. and Greek law enforcement officials is excellent; the GOG pursues U.S. requests for legal assistance energetically.
Although Greek laws permit the seizure of assets related to drug convictions, they do not permit the sharing of seized assets with other countries.
Due to budget constraints, Greek authorities are unable to devote adequate resources to anti-narcotics activities; as a result, police equipment is often outdated and training is infrequent.
The anti-narcotics unit of the Greek police does not have its own budget.
Corruption.
The Ministry of Public Order opened a Bureau of Internal Affairs in October 1999 to combat police corruption.
A billion drachma (about $350 million) package was under development to train police and deter corruption.
Local U.S. authorities had no reports of serious corruption within the narcotics department of the police force, nor in other governmental anti-narcotics agencies.
The government ombudsman's office, created in 1998, has authority to investigate corruption complaints within the governmental bodies that bear the anti-narcotics responsibility in Greece.
Agreements and Treaties.
Greece is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, and meets the convention's goals and objectives relating to drug cultivation, distribution, sale, transport, law enforcement, transit cooperation, and demand reduction.
Greece has passed implementing legislation for essential and precursor chemical controls.
An agreement between the GOG and the U.S. to exchange information on narcotics trafficking has been in force since 1928, and an extradition treaty has been in force since 1932.
A new Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty (MLAT) between the U.S. and the GOG was signed and awaits ratification by Congress and the Greek Parliament.
Progress was made in 1999 to advance the Police Protocol agreement which, when signed, will enhance operational police cooperation between the two countries.
The U.S. has concluded a Customs Mutual Assistance Agreement (CMAA) with the GOG.
Cultivation/Production.
Cannabis, cultivated in small amounts for local consumption, is the only illicit drug produced in Greece.
Drug Flow/Transit.
Greece is a major transshipment route to Western Europe for heroin from Turkey, hashish from the Middle East, and heroin, ecstasy, and marijuana from South Asia.
Marijuana and other drugs are smuggled across the borders from Albania, Bulgaria and FYROM.
Marijuana has been smuggled into Greece on pack mules across the mountainous border with Albania.
Hashish is off-loaded in remote areas of the country and transported to Western Europe by boat or overland.
Larger shipments are smuggled into Greece in shipping containers, on bonded "TIR" trucks, in automobiles, on trains, and in buses.
Such trucks typically enter Greece via Turkish border crossings, then cross the Adriatic by ferry to Italy.
A small portion of these drugs is smuggled into the U.S., including Turkish heroin that is traded for Latin American cocaine.
Nigerian drug organizations smuggle heroin and cocaine through the Athens airport, and increasingly through the Aegean islands, from Turkey.
The police have raided several organizations selling anabolic steroids (not a controlled substance in Greece) by mail to purchasers in the U.S. Cocaine also transits through Greece to other parts of Europe.
Domestic Programs.
OKANA coordinates all national anti-narcotics policy in Greece.
It heads demand reduction efforts, develops and administers information and prevention programs, runs treatment centers for substance abusers, and coordinates with other agencies involved in narcotics treatment and prevention.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
U.S. Policy Initiatives.
DEA has a close working relationship with representatives of the Greek coast guard, the national police, customs, SDOE, and INTERPOL.
Embassy Athens' economic section maintains regular contact with SDOE and facilitated the visit by the U.S. Treasury's FinCEN (financial crimes enforcement network) to SDOE in October 1999.
The Embassy's office for public diplomacy regularly distributes literature on drug prevention, and periodically arranges background briefings with DEA officers for local journalists and general informational seminars.
Local DEA officials are frequent speakers at local schools.
Another program provides grants to Kethea (a self-regulating legal entity under the supervision of the Ministry of Health, providing treatment, vocational training and social rehabilitation to drug addicts) to bring U.S. rehabilitation experts for two weeks at a time to train Greek therapists.
The Road Ahead.
The U.S. will encourage the GOG to continue to participate actively in international organizations such as the Dublin Group.
DEA will continue to seek funding to offer training to Greek officials.
Hungary
I. Summary
Hungary is an important transit country for illegal narcotics to western Europe.
Overall, the number of seizures increased by 12 percent, while the total weight of drugs confiscated slightly decreased.
Domestic consumption of illegal narcotics, particularly LSD and ecstasy, continues to be a problem.
The Government of Hungary (GOH) passed anti-drug legislation in late 1998 that went into effect in early 1999.
Among the strictest in Europe, the new legislation introduced stiff penalties for using and/or selling narcotics.
This legislation was followed by a government campaign to eliminate corruption among government officials, especially those in the political or judicial sphere.
Drug traffickers may be punished with life imprisonment.
Civil rights activists have argued that the new laws unfairly punish casual users.
The USG and GOH have both a Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty (MLAT) and an Extradition Treaty.
An information sharing MOU to further improve U.S.-Hungarian law enforcement cooperation was signed in January 2000.
Hungary is party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Hungary continued to serve as a major transit country for illegal narcotics smuggled from southwest Asia, mainly heroin from Turkey, and the Balkans to western Europe.
Unrest in the former Yugoslavia, coupled with the good road, rail and air connections in Hungary, make Hungary an attractive route for drug smugglers.
Drug confiscation on Hungary's borders increased slightly in 1999, although several important areas showed steep declines.
For example, heroin confiscations declined, in part due to the vigilance of inspectors at Budapest's Ferihegy international airport, diverting heroin shipments to other routes.
Yet, Nigerian cocaine traffickers continue to successfully smuggle cocaine into Western Europe through the Hungarian airport.
Moreover, in 1999, the number of marijuana and hashish confiscation's increased sharply (over 20 percent) over 1998 figures, according to GOH reports.
The reduction in the weight of these confiscations, however, was even more startling.
The gross weight of marijuana confiscated in 1999 compared to 1998 fell by over 90 percent.
Similar figures are available for hashish confiscations by weight.
The GOH assesses that foreign groups primarily control the transit and sale of narcotics in Hungary, particularly from Albania, Turkey and Nigeria.
Many of these groups have been resident in Hungary for many years.
Ethnic Turks increasingly are using more sophisticated means of transporting drugs through Hungary, including the use of German-licensed vehicles that are not as closely scrutinized by border guards.
Hungarian authorities report an increasingly serious domestic drug consumption problem, but GOH statistics vary widely.
The Ministry of Youth and Sports Affairs (MYSA), the element of the Hungarian government nominally responsible for drug use statistics, estimated the number of addicts in 1999 at 25,000 to 30,000.
However, in October, Hungary's medical community, estimated the number at between 40,000 and 80,000.
MYSA figures from 1998 assessed that there were over 100,000 addicts and 35,000 to 50,000 occasional users.
Drug-related deaths from overdoses and traffic accidents rose from 204 in 1995 to 339 in 1997 (latest available figures).
Between 1995 and 1998 the number of hospital-reported drug treatment cases for children and teenagers increased by a factor of 2.5.
Heroin and cocaine prices are relatively stable, but still remain too high for most Hungarians.
Domestically produced ecstasy, LSD and marijuana are readily available and their use is rising.
Criminal penalties for producing precursor chemicals were substantially increased by enactment of the new legislation.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
Anti-crime legislation introduced into law on March 1, 1999 was the first initiative of the new government elected in May 1998.
The legislation stiffens Hungary's criminal code, extends life imprisonment for drug trafficking, allows confiscation of property, creates new criminal provisions for production of chemical precursors and increases penalties for drug-related crimes.
All drug consumers, including casual users, are subject to criminal penalties, although addicts may be exempted from prosecution.
Civil rights leaders claim that the new provisions, among the toughest in Europe, will unfairly punish casual users, while exempting addicts.
An ad hoc parliamentary committee called for the disbanding of the inter-ministerial drug committee by a "drug czar" and a new office responsible for anti- narcotics strategy.
Both initiatives, if approved, would be subordinate to the Prime Minister's office.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
Hungarian and Austrian border authorities continue joint cross-border anti-narcotics investigation efforts begun in 1998.
GOH officials continue to participate in international law enforcement training efforts, particularly through the Budapest-based International Law Enforcement Academy (ILEA).
Eastern Hungary has seen initial steps toward joint border control efforts with Romanian and Ukrainian counterparts, while newly updated detection equipment at high-incident border posts will help to bring down incident rates in these areas.
Corruption.
Hungary's new governing coalition passed an anti-Mafia package that went into effect in early 1999.
Its provisions include increased criminal penalties for organized crime relating to drugs and money laundering in addition to a number of other areas.
The GOH has taken measures to focus attention on corruption, especially among government officials.
The new commander of the border guards, upon assuming office in late 1999, unveiled plans for a new personnel system that will break up the continuity of border guard posts in an effort to separate groups of border guards who may engage in corruption.
Agreements and Treaties.
Hungary is a party to the 1961 UN Single Convention amended by the 1972 Protocol, the 1971 UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances, and the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
An extradition treaty and an MLAT between the U.S. and Hungary have been in force since 1997.
In January 2000, the U.S. and GOH concluded a bilateral information-sharing MOU that will allow U.S. and Hungarian law enforcement officials to work more closely together on investigations of mutual interest.
The USG has concluded a Customs Mutual Assistance Agreement (CMAA) with the Government of Hungary.
Illicit Cultivation.
GOH authorities claim that marijuana, ecstasy and LSD are locally produced; all other illegal narcotics are imported into Hungary.
Marijuana is mostly cultivated in western Hungary.
Twenty marijuana plantations reportedly were eradicated in 1998, but only 4 were reported through the first half of 1999 with a combined weight of 500-kg (latest available data).
Demand Reduction.
In 1999 the GOH, through the Ministry for Youth and Sports Affairs, spent approximately U.S. $ 400,000 on demand reduction activities.
Nearly 75 percent of these funds were used for local programs and media events.
Approximately 10 percent was used for publications and training.
The USG, EU, and other international donors also provide some funding for demand reduction efforts.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
The USG focuses its support for GOH counternarcotics efforts on training and cooperation, primarily through the Budapest-based, Department of State (Bureau for International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs)-funded ILEA, established in 1995.
In 1999 ILEA trained approximately 160 Hungarians, as well as law enforcement officials throughout the region.
In the near future, ILEA hopes to participate in the training of Kosovar police officers as a way to share primarily U.S., but also European, including Hungarian, experience with Hungary's neighbor to the south.
DEA also conducts training programs for its Hungarian counterparts.
DEA maintains an office in Vienna, Austria that is accredited to Hungary and works with local authorities.
The Road Ahead.
The USG is supportive of Hungarian legislative efforts to stiffen criminal penalties for drug offenses and will continue to support the GOH through training at ILEA and ad hoc initiatives elsewhere.
The USG's law enforcement initiative is bringing greater USG resources to bear on the fight against organized crime, including drug trafficking.
As part of that effort, the USG will continue to sponsor law enforcement training programs and technical assistance via a "6-point" plan developed in October 1998 to combat organized crime.
Iceland
I. Summary
Iceland is not a significant drug-producing or drug-transiting country.
Most of the illegal drugs in Iceland originate from outside the country and appear to be brought in solely for the domestic market.
The government is concerned, however, that the country's numerous unsupervised harbors and airstrips could make Iceland attractive to international drug traffickers looking for a transit point between continental Europe and the U.S.
To better coordinate the activities of national and local authorities in the fight against drugs, the national Alcohol and Drug-Prevention Council was established in 1999.
There is hope that the government's "Iceland without drugs" program, launched in 1997, is bearing fruit.
A survey of 10th graders shows alcohol and drug use dropping for the first time since 1990.
At the same time, however, other evidence indicates that general drug abuse is continuing to increase, as it has since 1995.
The police had a record year in seizing drugs, largely due to the bust of a major drug ring, which had an estimated 30 to 40 percent of the hashish market.
This case also marks the first time that the government pursued money laundering charges and moved to seize the assets of those involved.
II.
Status of Country
Illegal drugs and precursor chemicals are not cultivated or produced in significant quantities in Iceland.
The harsh climate and lack of arable land make the outdoor cultivation of drug crops almost impossible.
Icelandic authorities believe that the production of drugs, to the extent it exists, is limited to individual marijuana plants and a small amount of homemade amphetamines.
The vast majority of illegal drugs found in Iceland originates from outside the country, mainly Denmark, Netherlands, Germany and the U.S.: chiefly cannabis, amphetamines, cocaine and ecstasy.
Icelandic authorities believe that most illegal drugs are smuggled into the country in commercial containers and by airline passengers.
There is some concern that Iceland's expected accession in 2000 to the Schengen Agreement could increase the problem of drugs entering with passengers arriving from other Schengen countries.
Conventional wisdom has held that Iceland's geographic isolation in the harsh environment of the North Atlantic protects it against other types of smuggling.
There is growing concern, however, that drug traffickers could be taking advantage of Iceland's sparse population and numerous unguarded harbors and airstrips to bring in drugs by small private boats and planes.
Drug abuse in Iceland is considered to have increased significantly since 1995, roughly coinciding with the economic boom that brought unprecedented prosperity to the country.
III.
Country Action Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
To better coordinate the counternarcotics efforts of national and local authorities, the national Alcohol and Drug-Prevention Council was established effective 1 January 1999.
The council includes a representative from each of the seven ministries involved in the fight against drugs (i.e., Prime Minister's office, Foreign Affairs, Social Affairs, Health, Justice, Finance and Education) as well as a representative from the National Association of Municipalities.
The existing five-year "Drug-Free Iceland" program, which began in 1997 as a cooperative effort among the national government, the city of Reykjavik, and the Association of European Cities against Drugs, is one of the council's main projects.
Accomplishments.
The 1999 figures for the number of drug seizures, and for the value of drug proceeds seized which were being laundered through a local business, set new records for Iceland.
The police estimate that the drug ring had been operating for at least a year and was supplying 30 to 40 percent of the hashish market.
For the first time ever, the government pursued money laundering charges and moved to seize the assets of those involved.
The street price of cannabis doubled immediately after the bust, but in a reflection at how quickly new supply sources can be found, the price returned to its former level after only a couple of weeks.
In another major drug bust based on a year and a half of surveillance, the police were successful in stopping a smaller group that had planned, over time, to bring in some 500 kilograms of illicit drugs from Barcelona, Spain.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
In March 1999, the National Police Commissioner and the Director of Customs signed an agreement to facilitate greater police and customs cooperation in the fight against illegal drugs.
The agreement includes provisions for the sharing of information, the establishment of a joint database, the holding of regular consultations, the use of drug dogs, and the exchange of officers.
In April 1999, the National Police Commissioner issued strict guidelines to the chiefs of police in each of the country's 27 administrative districts regarding the investigation of drug cases.
The chiefs of police must now send a monthly report to the National Police Commission outlining who in their district is suspected of producing, importing or distributing illegal drugs and what the district police are doing about it.
To assist the district chiefs of police in pursuing drug cases, the National Police Commission has divided the country into five operational areas and assigned a specially trained narcotics officer to each one.
In addition, a special anti-drug task force has been established to conduct operations in the southwest of Iceland, where most of the illegal drugs are believed to enter the country.
In April 1999, a special committee convoked by the Minister of Justice issued a report recommending legal changes to allow greater use of "unconventional" techniques by police when investigating drug crimes.
Corruption.
Public corruption is rare in Iceland and there has never been a case of it involving illegal narcotics.
Agreements and Treaties.
Iceland is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention as well as the 1990 European Convention on Money Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of Criminal Proceeds.
Cultivation/Production.
There is no significant cultivation or production of illegal drugs, aside from isolated marijuana plants grown for personal use and small amounts of homemade amphetamines.
Drug Flow/Transit.
There is no evidence currently that Iceland is being used as a transit country by international drug traffickers.
The illegal drugs arriving in the country appear to be solely for the domestic market.
There is concern, however, that Iceland's many unsupervised harbors and airfields could make the country attractive as a transit point in the future.
Domestic Programs.
The "Drug-Free Iceland" program, launched in 1997, continued in 1999 to mobilize Icelandic society as a whole in the fight against drugs.
Through a series of highly visible ad campaigns, special emphasis was put on educating parents about the reality of drug and alcohol abuse by contemporary Icelandic youth and reminding them of their primary role in preventing such abuse by doing such things as enforcing the legal curfew.
There were indications in 1999 that these efforts might be having an effect.
An annual survey of Icelandic 10th graders showed a decrease in alcohol and illicit drug use.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
U.S. Policy Initiatives.
The U.S. objective in Iceland has been to facilitate to the extent possible counternarcotics cooperation between working-level officials.
The embassy has addressed this in two ways: by bringing U.S. experts to Iceland to discuss their experience in fighting drugs, and by sending Icelandic police and other officials to the U.S. to participate in international visitor programs and/or law enforcement training.
A November 1999 speaker program, for example, brought two drug prevention experts from Hazleton, Pennsylvania, to Iceland to discuss how they mobilized their communities to fight drug abuse.
Icelandic experts visiting the U.S., such as the police officers who have attended the FBI academy, have frequently developed contacts that continue to prove beneficial to both countries.
Bilateral Cooperation.
Under a 1989 bilateral agreement, a Joint Information Coordination Center (JICC) was established in Iceland, which was designed to facilitate information exchange regarding small aircraft flying between the U.S. and Europe via Iceland.
The JICC reports information about transiting planes to the El Paso Intelligence Center (EPIC), which, in turn, notifies the JICC whether derogatory information exists on that particular aircraft or its passengers.
Use of the JICC, however, has yielded limited results in Iceland in terms of arrests and seizures.
Icelandic officials are currently reviewing their participation in the system.
There are several new avenues for bilateral cooperation, based on a meeting that the U.S. Attorney General had with the Icelandic Justice Minister in November 1999.
The Justice Minister expressed interest in learning more about police training in the U.S. with a view toward upgrading Icelandic training; sending Icelandic police officers to the U.S. on study trips and consultations to become familiar with the U.S. system; receiving information about the latest technical equipment used by police in the U.S.; having Icelandic border police receive training on fraudulent travel documents; and obtaining advice on how to enhance Iceland's collection of statistical information on drug crimes.
The Road Ahead.
The U.S. will continue to foster bilateral cooperation with Iceland through its speaker and international visitor programs.
Embassy Reykjavik, in cooperation with DEA and legal attaches in Copenhagen, will also work to make the JICC mechanism more useful for both countries and to respond to the Justice Minister's specific requests for cooperation and assistance.
Ireland
I. Summary
The Republic of Ireland does not figure prominently in international drug trafficking, although increasing drug abuse among Irish youth continues to have a significant domestic impact.
In 1999, the Irish government maintained a heightened anti-drug effort aimed at interdiction and demand reduction and approved new counternarcotics legislation.
There have been no verifiable instances of Ireland being used as a transshipment point for narcotics being sent to the U.S. Ireland is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Drug seizures within the Republic and off its coast continue to show that Ireland is used as a transit point for the shipment of narcotics to and from continental Europe.
Current drug flows in Ireland indicate that this transshipment role remains small; however, an extensive and largely unguarded coastline may mean a future increase in drug flows.
Ireland is not a significant source of drugs or precursor chemicals.
Money laundering, although still relatively limited, has seen an increase in value over the last few years.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
Ireland continues to devote considerable resources to its counternarcotics efforts.
In 1999, the government approved new legislation concerning mandatory prison sentences for drug dealers, witness protection, and money laundering and announced a multi-million dollar demand reduction program.
Authorities stepped up anti-narcotics cooperation with other European countries and ties were further reinforced between the Garda Siochana (National Police) and U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) during an asset forfeiture seminar.
Cultivation/Production.
Cultivation of narcotics remains limited to small quantities of cannabis.
The Garda continued to break up small indoor growing operations throughout the year.
Over the last few years, the Gardai have seized fewer than 1,000 cannabis plants annually, indicating limited growth of cannabis in Ireland, usually using hydroponic methods in an indoor operation.
The influx of "serious" narcotic substances, such as methamphetamine and cocaine, continued into Ireland in 1999, renewing fears by the police that domestic production of psychotropic substances may begin in the near future.
To date, there is still no evidence of domestic synthetic drug production capability.
Drug Flow/Transit.
Drug seizures in 1999 confirmed a continued increase in the flow of narcotics into Ireland.
Irish authorities acknowledge that the republic remains a "gateway" for imports of cannabis, cocaine and amphetamines to continental Europe.
The cocaine is thought to come primarily from Colombia and other countries in Latin America and the Caribbean.
Cannabis and amphetamine shipments are thought to originate in the Netherlands and eastern European countries respectively.
In the opposite direction, Ireland continues as a recipient of heroin shipments via the U.K.
There have been no verifiable instances of Ireland being used as a transshipment point for narcotics being sent to the U.S..
In 1999, Gardai continued to destroy narcotics networks in operation throughout Ireland.
Concerns remain, however, that such organizations are moving to more complex networks and distribution systems, including the involvement of non-Irish criminals.
Domestic Programs.
Drug abuse in Ireland is still increasing, albeit at a slower rate than that of other western European countries.
Drug abuse among the young is especially prevalent.
A recent survey estimated that Irish teenagers are twice as likely to have sampled heroin than most other young Europeans and 40% of Irish 16-year-olds have tried cannabis.
The government stepped up its demand reduction efforts, allocating approximately $54 million over the next several years toward local community drug task forces responsible for the implementation of education and prevention programs, community activity programs, local volunteer anti-drug efforts and similar programs.
Accomplishments.
In 1999, the Irish government continued to make its fight against drug trafficking a high priority.
It approved funding for recruitment of an additional 500 Gardai, as part of the government's effort to bring the police force to 12,000 police officers.
It adopted legislation setting a minimum mandatory 10 year sentence for those convicted of dealing drugs worth 10,000 Irish pounds or more, and creating protections for witnesses called to testify at trial.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
Gardai were involved during 1999 in several successful million-dollar drug busts of various substances including cannabis, cocaine and ecstasy.
One notable case involved cooperation with Spanish authorities and Europol that yielded a $1.6 billion cocaine seizure in Spanish waters.
The Irish Defense forces continue to contribute to anti- narcotics efforts in the Republic.
The Irish Navy is part of Ireland's drugs task force, with the Gardai and customs, and sees drug interdiction as one of its major roles while patrolling the territorial waters of Ireland.
It conducts several exercises each year with the British Navy focused specifically on interdiction efforts.
The Irish Air Corps supplies a variety of aircraft in support of these operations.
Irish counternarcotics organizations continue to work closely with their counterparts in Europe and the U.S.
In September, Irish authorities hosted a DEA-sponsored asset forfeiture seminar in Dublin.
Ireland was also the host of the European chapter of International Association of Chiefs of Police (IACP) annual conference in May, attended by the directors of the U.S. Customs Service, the FBI and DEA.
Corruption.
There were no verifiable instances of police or other official corruption related to drug activities in 1999.
Agreements and Treaties.
Ireland signed agreements with the U.S. on customs cooperation and taxation, and is also a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, the Council of Europe convention on mutual assistance in criminal matters, and the Europol Convention.
There is a 1983 extradition treaty in place between the U.S. and Ireland.
Although Ireland is not an identified source of precursor chemicals, the Republic maintains controls in accordance with the EU-U.S. Agreement on Precursor Chemical Control of 1997.
Ireland is a member of the Dublin group and held the chairmanship until December 1999.
Ireland continues to actively seek the extradition of drug traffickers from various states, mostly from within the European Union.
As a participant in the United Nations Drug Control Program (UNDCP), Ireland in 1999 contributed approximately $280,000 to the organization's funds, slightly greater than the 1998 contribution.
Fifty percent of this amount was earmarked for general purposes relating to institution/capacity building and alternative development.
Twenty-five percent was used for anti-narcotics efforts in the Caribbean region with the other 25 percent aimed at alternative development in the Apurimac region in Peru.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
U.S. and Irish counternarcotics officials furthered their close working relationship in both official and unofficial capacities throughout 1999.
In addition to handling requests for investigative assistance and background information, officials were often involved in joint operations/investigations.
Most notably, the Garda Siochana hosted a DEA asset forfeiture seminar in September, with participants from Irish law enforcement agencies, the Isle of Man police and the Jersey and Guernsey police.
The Road Ahead.
By supporting Irish efforts to counter drug trafficking, the U.S. can help ensure that Ireland does not become a transit point for narcotics trafficking to the U.S. and that Ireland's developing financial services market does not become a haven for money laundering.
In pursuit of these objectives, the U.S. will continue to offer cooperation and assistance with Irish authorities in this field.
Italy
I. Summary
There have been no significant changes in Italy's status, nor its counternarcotics program since last year's report.
The Government of Italy (GOI) continues to be committed to the fight against drug trafficking.
Italian organized crime groups continue to be involved in international drug trafficking and money laundering.
The collapse of the former Soviet Union and the political turmoil in former Yugoslavia has strengthened links between Italian organized crime and Russian and Albanian criminal organizations, and other organized crime groups active in the former Yugoslavian countries.
GOI cooperation with U.S. law enforcement agencies continues to be exemplary.
Italy is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Italy is not a drug producing country.
The last heroin-processing laboratory was discovered in 1985; locally-produced heroin was last seized in 1987.
Although there are no cocaine HCl processing laboratories in Italy, Colombians and Italians have jointly set up cocaine conversion sites.
A cocaine conversion laboratory was seized in Rome in 1999.
III.
Country Action Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
Possession of small amounts of illegal drugs is not a criminal offense in Italy.
Although the majority of the population is opposed to the legalization of drugs, the Italian radical party has proposed legislation to legalize drugs such as hashish and marijuana.
Italy continues to promote the Teledrug system (a data base system proposal to facilitate the sharing of drug intelligence among nations, in which 13 countries participate), and has requested that the U.S. participate also.
The Italian Central Directorate for Anti-drug services (Direzione Centrale per i Servizi Antidroga or DCSA) provides training for Italian and foreign law enforcement officers such as Russians and Albanians, and currently has drug liaison officers in 17 countries.
Italy is a major contributor to the United Nations Drug Control Program (UNDCP), based in Vienna, and contributed approximately U.S. $ 9 million in 1998 to UN programs to combat illegal drugs and crime.
Accomplishments.
Several major organized crime figures were arrested in 1999.
Narcotics seizure statistics for 1999, contrasted with 1998 figures, suggest progress in the war on drugs: 1273 kg heroin seized (710 kg in 1998), 2895 kg cocaine (2151 kg), 42383 kg hashish (15404 kg), 20332 kg marijuana (39118 kg), 286225 ecstasy tablets (129716 tabs), 745 deaths due to overdose (1075), and 23280 persons charged for drug trafficking (23625).
Law Enforcement Efforts.
The fight against drugs has been a major priority of each of the three police services and is coordinated by DCSA.
Corruption.
There is no indication of drug-related corruption in Italy.
Agreements and Treaty.
Italy is a party to the 1961 UN Single Convention and its 1972 Protocol, the 1971 UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances, and the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
Both extradition and mutual legal assistance treaties are in place between Italy and the U.S. Italy is a member of the Italian-American-Canadian-French working group, as well as the bilateral Italian-American working group, which both held annual meetings in Italy in 1999.
As a member of the European Community, Italy participates in the Dublin group, UNDCP Pompidou group, Europol and EU cabinet, and attendant committees and working groups.
The U.S. has concluded a Customs Mutual Assistance Agreement (CMAA) with Italy.
Italy is also a party to the World Customs Organization's International Convention on Mutual Administrative Assistance for the Prevention, Investigation, and Repression of Customs Offenses (Nairobi Convention), Annex X on Assistance in Narcotics Cases.
Cultivation/Production.
There is no known coca bush cultivation in Italy.
Some opium poppy grows spontaneously in the southern part of Italy and the islands of Sicily and Sardinia, but its alkaloid content is minimal and thus does not present a threat.
Although small amounts of homegrown marijuana are cultivated in southern Italy, the THC content is so minimal that it is only marketed locally.
Drug Flow/Transit.
Italy is a consumer and transshipment country.
It is a major transit point for heroin coming from southwest Asia destined to other European countries, particularly since the political turmoil in Balkan countries has caused narcotics shipments to diverge from the heavily-used "Balkan Route," re-routing through Italy; this is reflected in the increase in heroin seizures in 1999.
The flow of cocaine to Italy from South America, transported by vessel and courier, also increased in 1999.
Cannabis seizures recorded a slight decrease, but at the same time the use of MDMA (ecstasy), imported from the Netherlands and other western European countries, increased.
Domestic Programs.
The GOI continued work on implementing the DARE program.
The most recent GOI data, published by the Ministry of the Interior in April 1999, indicates that as of December 1997, Italy had 552 public health departments operated by the Ministry of Health, assisting 94,955 patients (80,897 male, 14,058 female).
Data from the 517 public health departments which reported (out of the 552 total) indicated that 40,864 patients received drug substitutes in the treatment of their addiction.
In addition, some l,306 social rehabilitation centers operated (as of June 1998 - latest data available) with various government funding levels, assisting a total of 22,248 patients.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
The U.S. and Italy enjoy exemplary cooperation on counter- narcotics efforts.
U.S. and Italian law enforcement authorities carry out numerous joint operations against drug traffickers, money launderers and organized crime.
Cooperation on extradition and mutual legal assistance is very good.
Current Italian legislation, however, makes it difficult to conduct to pursue money laundering investigations concerning drug and other illegal activities proceeds.
The Road Ahead.
The U.S. will continue to work closely with Italy on law enforcement operations and investigations targeting international narcotics trafficking networks and organized crime.
Kazakhstan
I. Summary
Kazakhstan continues to be a popular drug corridor for trafficking of opium from Afghanistan and Pakistan to Russian and Western European markets.
The volume of drugs produced and smuggled increased in 1999.
Kazakhstan has one of the region's most developed banking systems and is a potential host for money laundering operations.
Thirty of the country's chemical plants have the capacity to manufacture chemical precursors, and Kazakhstan produces acetic anhydride, a heroin precursor, which is exported to Russia and other Central Asian countries.
Drug abuse, especially of heroin and opium, continues to increase, with a drop in the average age of drug users.
Kazakhstan is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Drug trafficking from Afghanistan of opium and heroin continues to increase dramatically.
An estimated 80-90 percent of drugs seized in Kazakhstan originate in Afghanistan.
Northbound trains from Kazakhstan to Moscow remain the most popular means of smuggling drugs, but use of air routes is increasing.
The number of registered drug abusers is approximately 34,000, but authorities estimate it to be 7-8 times higher.
The majority of abusers now favor opium and heroin over hashish; intravenous use is increasing compared to the previously more popular method of smoking the drugs.
III.
Country Action Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
Kazakhstan met the goals and objectives of the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
The government recognizes the need for increased law enforcement cooperation with its neighbors and conducted several joint border operations in 1999 with Russia, Uzbekistan, and Kyrgyzstan.
It is negotiating formal border demarcations with several of its neighbors, which could eventually facilitate more effective border controls.
Accomplishments.
In April 1999, Kazakhstan opened an inter-agency law enforcement/counternarcotics training center in Almaty, which trained over 185 law enforcement officials on various topics and has hosted training conducted by the UNDCP and the U.S.
In 1999, the GOK granted formal diplomatic accreditation to the UNDCP regional representative.
Kazakhstan has generally cooperated with UNDCP efforts and initiatives.
However, implementation of some aspects of the 1998 UNDCP Master Plan for Counternarcotics and Related Crimes has been hindered by lack of government funding.
The State Drug Control Commission, organized in 1994, has not been consistently effective.
At the end of 1999, Kazakhstan was in the process of considering establishment of a new anti-drug agency with ministry-level status.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
There were approximately 4,000 drug cases opened in 1999.
Over 220 kilograms of heroin were reported seized in 1999, as well as over 30 tons of marijuana and hashish.
One of the largest single seizures involved 73 kilograms of opium and 7.5 kilograms of heroin.
Reported amounts of cocaine seized have been relatively steady for the past three years (less than one kilogram annually), but appear to be of increased purity.
The Ministry of Internal Affairs (police), the Committee for National Security, and the Customs Committee all play a role in drug control efforts, but they often lack equipment, resources and technical expertise to do their jobs.
Progress has been uneven in the area of improved cooperation among the law enforcement bodies and there is a need to clarify the division of responsibilities.
Corruption.
The State Anti-corruption Commission began operating in January 1999.
This body is well-funded and is becoming well-organized.
A state-sponsored conference on corruption issues was conducted in June, with governmental and private sector participation from Kazakhstan, Russia, and international organizations.
In 1999, over 400 cases were opened under Kazakhstan's 1998 anti-corruption law; detailed statistics of the charges are scarce.
Additional regulations under this law are under consideration.
Corruption remains widespread among lower and mid-level government officials, principally due to low salaries.
Agreements and Treaties.
Kazakhstan is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, the 1961 UN Single Convention and its 1972 protocol and the 1971 Convention.
Kazakhstan is also a party to a 1996 Memorandum of Understanding on Drug Control in Central Asia, which includes Kyrgyzstan, Tajikistan, Uzbekistan, Turkmenistan, Russia and the UNDCP.
Cultivation and Production.
Kazakhstan is not a major cultivator or producer of opium or heroin.
GOK authorities discovered and destroyed less than one hectare of opium poppy plots in 1999, over one third of the total estimated cultivation.
The Chu Valley area contains at least 110,000 hectares of wild growing cannabis.
Other parts of Kazakhstan contain an estimated 150,000 hectares of wild cannabis and much smaller areas of cultivated cannabis.
The estimated annual harvest of marijuana is 5-6,000 metric tons.
Most of the cannabis is consumed locally or exported to other countries in the region, but none is destined for the U.S.
Drug Flow/Transit.
Kazakhstan is a significant transit country for opiates produced in Southwest Asia destined for markets in Russia and Western Europe, and probably, to a lesser extent, to the United States.
Drug traffickers use adolescent or elderly people, especially women, to smuggle drugs along various road and rail routes, with increased use of commercial air routes as well.
Law enforcement officials note that smugglers often transport drugs internally; some cases have involved illegal drugs packaged to resemble legal pharmaceuticals.
There is evidence that Kazakhstan is used for transit of precursor chemicals from Russia and other Central Asian countries to Southwest Asia for the illicit production of heroin.
Domestic Programs/Demand Reduction.
With U.S., British, and UNDCP funding, schoolteachers from around the country were trained in the use of an anti-drug education curriculum for students ages 7-17.
Government drug treatment programs often are not adequately funded, but there has been support from some local officials for individual private non-profit treatment programs.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives
The U.S. goal is to provide training and assistance to strengthen Kazakhstan's ability to combat narcotics trafficking and the associated problems of organized crime, corruption, money laundering, and drug abuse.
Bilateral Cooperation.
In 1999, the U.S. provided regional seminars and training at various sites in Kazakhstan, including at the new inter-agency law enforcement/counternarcotics training facility.
More than 150 law enforcement and judicial officials from Kazakhstan participated in eleven programs.
The U.S. donated two major pieces of forensic equipment for analysis of evidence in drug and other cases, as well as computer equipment.
Road Ahead.
The U.S. will continue to support UNDCP efforts to encourage full implementation of the master plan for the control of illicit drugs and organized crime.
Of particular importance is continued support for demand reduction initiatives and for the law enforcement/counternarcotics training center.
Kyrgyzstan
I. Summary
Although not a major producer of illicit narcotics, Kyrgyzstan is an important transit country for opium and heroin going to Russia and Western Europe from Afghanistan.
Kyrgyzstan produces a potent strain of marijuana that is used domestically and in the region.
Law enforcement agencies have made counternarcotics a top priority, but they remain poorly funded, undertrained, and understaffed.
Kyrgyzstan participates in anti-narcotics efforts in the region and actively cooperates with the UNDCP.
Kyrgyzstan became a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention in 1994.
II.
Status of the Country
During the Soviet era, Kyrgyzstan was a main producer of opium for legal medicines and retains the technology and ability to produce these substances.
Its long and unprotected border with Tajikistan, whose internal difficulties have created a haven for drug trafficking, have made Kyrgyzstan an attractive transit route.
Seizures of illicit narcotics continue to rise and the amount of Afghan heroin transiting Kyrgyzstan has increased dramatically, although none has been found to have reached the U.S.
As a result of the drug trade, authorities report that organized crime has increased, as has money laundering.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
The Kyrgyz legislature has approved an asset forfeiture statute; however, according to law enforcement officials, the law is weak and enforcement can be drawn out through a lengthy judicial process.
Law enforcement agencies have made counternarcotics efforts a top priority, with concentrated efforts aimed at border control.
Accomplishments.
Although final figures of 1999 seizures are unavailable, authorities expect figures to increase from previous years due to the increase in opium production in Afghanistan and the weak internal situation in Tajikistan.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
In the major cities, Kyrgyz police have funded anti-drug units, however, these groups tend to be very small and without resources.
In Osh, a major transit point, there has been a greater effort by authorities to control the situation.
The Kyrgyz embrace proposals for combined regional efforts, such as the Central Asian Intelligence and Coordination Center, but are limited by severe budget constraints.
Corruption.
Corruption is a widely acknowledged problem in Kyrgyzstan and there is no reason to believe that those agencies involved in counternarcotics enforcement are immune to it.
Agreements and Treaties.
Kyrgyzstan is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, the 1961 UN Single Convention and its 1972 Protocol and the 1971 UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances.
It is also a party to the Central Asian Counternarcotics Protocol with the UN.
Kyrgyzstan has extant extradition statutes and has extradited terrorists accused of complicity in the February 1999 bombings in Uzbekistan.
However, there is no known instance of extradition relating to drug charges.
Kyrgyzstan and the U.S. do not have a bilateral extradition or Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty.
Cultivation and Production.
Except for an estimated 100 hectares of marijuana that mostly grows wild, Kyrgyzstan does not cultivate nor produce any major illicit narcotics.
Drug Flow/Transit.
Because of its border with Tajikistan, Kyrgyzstan has become an important transit route for opium and heroin from Afghanistan to Russian and Western European markets.
Demand Reduction.
The increase in opium and heroin transit has increased the user population in the country, but there are no official estimates of drug use.
There are also no hospitals that offer drug treatment.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
Kyrgyzstan has been receptive to U.S. training assistance provided during 1999.
It has also cooperated with UNDCP and European Union members, especially in the area of improving the Customs Service ability to detect illegal narcotics shipments.
Kyrgyzstan has made it clear that it wishes to maintain and enhance its anti-drug efforts.
In 1999, the U.S. provided eight training courses to law enforcement officers to enhance their capability in law enforcement and counternarcotics efforts.
The Road Ahead.
Kyrgyz efforts will continue to be constrained by financial, manpower, training and equipment shortages.
The government recognizes that its greatest problem is inadequate border control and has requested assistance to improve border control capabilities.
The U.S. will continue to provide training assistance with an emphasis on border control.
Latvia
I. Summary
Drug trafficking and abuse in Latvia continued to increase rapidly in 1999 following the pattern of previous years.
The government's limited counternarcotics efforts reflect the lack of funding brought on by severe budget constraints during a recent economic recession.
The Latvian government continues to receive assistance from the international community and multilateral organizations although the Riga-based EU Phare Drug Program Regional Coordination Unit has closed.
Latvia is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Latvia's traditional economic role as a key transit port for products to and from Russia and central Asia has extended into the narcotics trade.
Latvian customs officials identify the port of Riga as a favorite destination for drug shipments destined for western Europe and the Nordic countries.
Latvian officials identify hashish and marijuana shipments in Latvia as originating in Afghanistan, Kazakhstan, and other central Asian countries.
Latvian authorities claim that many Azerbaijani nationals are involved in hashish trafficking.
It is reported that most of the hashish smuggled into Latvia comes in by truck or rail transport.
There is evidence that drugs shipped from central Asia travel onward to Scandinavia and elsewhere in the world market including the U.S., although not in quantities that appear to have any significant effect on the U.S..
Local production is minimal and declining in the face of lower prices for imported heroin and cocaine.
The Latvian domestic market for drugs is increasing at an alarming rate especially among young people.
The rates for drug-related crimes, deaths and HIV infections are also rising rapidly.
Latvian officials continue to identify their major internal drug concerns as poppy straw/opium, ephedrine-based substances, cannabis products and Ecstasy.
They continue to identify opium products (acetylated opium synthesized from poppy straw) as their major domestic problem.
Latvian authorities have reported the increased availability of heroin believed to be supplied through Estonia by ethnic Azerbaijani traffickers.
This white heroin is replacing the traditional poppy straw as the drug of choice for local addicts.
It is assumed that organized crime groups control the trade of drugs in Latvia.
Latvian police officials have identified members of crime groups from the CIS as the most active network of smugglers.
These groups include ethnic Russians, Azerbaijani's, Latvians connected to outside traffickers such as Dutch nationals providing hashish, and a very broad category the Latvian's refer to as "gypsies."
The Latvian government has a money laundering law and regulatory system in place.
There have been large cash transfers into Latvian banks from the CIS countries.
However, these transactions are not judged to be drug-related.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs
Policy Initiatives.
The government officially adopted the Drug Control and Drug Abuse Prevention Master Plan for the period 1999-2003 and noted the importance of fighting the narcotics problem for the future of Latvia.
Developed with the assistance of UNDCP, the plan identifies demand reduction, interdiction, and criminal prosecution as important priorities for Latvia.
However, no funding was provided for the implementation of specific projects.
A specialized group for drug-related cases was formed in the prosecutor's office on organized crime.
The National Drug Information Center has established a web site: www.narko.lv.
Accomplishments.
1999 brought several high-profile cases, including the arrest and sentencing of the Latvian Models Association president and her manager, the arrest by Sweden of the operators of the Stockholm-Riga ferry, and the arrest of a Latvian fishing ship by France.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
All statistics for criminal enforcement rose steeply, reflecting increased drug use.
The police have acknowledged their lack of resources to handle the increasing drug problem.
Drug-related crimes increased from 288 for the first 9 months of 1998 to 337 for the same period of 1999.
Corruption.
The USG does not know of any drug-related corruption in the government of Latvia.
Though perception of corruption is a problem for Latvia, actual public corruption is not pervasive.
Agreements and Treaties.
In 1993, Latvia became a party to the 1961 Single Convention, the1971 Convention of Psychotropic Substances, and the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
The U.S. has both a Customs Mutual Assistance Agreement (CMAA) and a Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty (MLAT) with Latvia.
The U.S. also has a 1924 bilateral Extradition Treaty in force with Latvia.
Domestic Programs.
In July 1999, the AIDS Center received funding to expand its needle exchange program.
The government has approved and will begin a school-level drug education program in the year 2000, funded by UNDCP.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
The U.S. Department of State's Bureau for International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs (INL) funds DEA, FBI and Customs to conduct training programs primarily focused on customs enforcement, and police/judicial training.
Latvian police and customs officials have been active participants in U.S.-funded training sessions at the International Law Enforcement Academy (ILEA) in Budapest, Hungary.
Multilateral Cooperation.
The EU PHARE Drug Program Coordination Unit closed its Riga-based regional office in November 1999.
The program is considered to be ongoing and will be coordinated from Brussels.
UNDCP maintains its regional office in Riga.
The U.S. Embassy participates in the mini-Dublin Group of Riga, which serves as a regional coordinating mechanism for anti-narcotics donor assistance programs.
The Road Ahead.
The 1999-2003 Master Plan contains a comprehensive assessment of Latvia's programs for the next three years.
Some programs have received multinational funding and others are internal to the separate Ministries' budgets.
The Central Bank is considering the adoption of "know your customer" money laundering regulations.
The prosecutors office has proposed stiffer sentences for drug offenders.
Lithuania
I. Summary
In 1999, new types of narcotics popular with the Lithuanian youth sub-culture appeared on the drug market, pushing prices down.
Narcotics-related crimes increased by 12 percent .
Lithuania continues to be a drug transit crossroads.
Although the Lithuanian State Security Department and police have participated in several successful operations with law enforcement agencies from neighboring countries, statistics show that only a small amount of narcotics being shipped through Lithuania is detected and interdicted.
To deal with this, the Government of Lithuania (GOL) Government has approved a new drug prevention program that will increase counternarcotics activities at the Customs department.
The USG intends to continue supporting counternarcotics efforts of GOL through specialized training courses.
Lithuania is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
According to police estimates, in the Lithuanian capital of Vilnius alone, some $12-17 million are being spent annually for narcotics.
Until 1998, most popular narcotics were cheap "local" narcotic substances, such as intravenous opium extract produced from locally grown poppies or derivatives made from medications containing ephedrine.
With the rise in standard of living, new competitive drugs, primarily synthetic, have appeared on the market.
For example, in 1999, the price of heroin went down from $15 down to $7 for a single dose and its use doubled.
A UNDCP report published in 1999 stated that a significantly broader cross-section of young people, compared with the relatively small group of drug-dependent individuals, is beginning to experiment with drugs.
The use of marijuana, ecstasy, LSD and amphetamines is often considered an integral part of the alternative youth sub-culture.
In an effort to expand the market, narcotics traders increased their activities nearby secondary schools and the number of those who try drugs among 15-16 year old pupils is growing rapidly.
There are 3000 officially registered narcotic addicts in Lithuania.
However, according to police estimates, there are about 15-20,000 narcotics abusers in Vilnius alone.
Although there has been a significant increase in recreational drug use, the majority of drug dependency cases (over 90 percent ) in Lithuania are still intravenous drug users.
According to the Lithuanian AIDS Center, from 1997 to September 1999, the number of HIV cases among intravenous drug users grew from one to 91 (and accounted for 51.4 percent of all HIV cases).
According to 1998 data from the Vilnius pubic health center, approximately 19 percent of Hepatitis C cases in Vilnius were individuals infected via intravenous drug use.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
The Lithuanian police have carried out several successful narcotics seizure operations with law enforcement agencies of Poland, Belarus, Latvia, and Russia's Kaliningrad district.
Also, the Lithuanian State Security Department has worked with Belarusian law enforcement agents and cut the narcotics route from Jamaica to Belarus.
In 1999, Lithuanian police seized approximately $13.75 million in narcotics and amounts of confiscated heroin have more than doubled over 1998.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
Compared to 1998, narcotics-related crimes increased by 12 percent in 1999.
The majority of criminal cases brought to court for narcotics-related crimes; 550 were related to the purchase and possession of narcotics for the individual use, while 85 criminal cases were brought for trade in narcotics and five for narcotics contraband.
There were 12 foreigners arrested for crimes related to narcotics, including citizens of Russia, Latvia, Azerbaijan, and Korea.
In April 1999, the Lithuanian registered ship "Kvedarna" with a Lithuanian crew was detained and searched at a Danish port.
Twelve tons of hashish was found on the ship, whose owner was known to Lithuanian police for his involvement in organized crime.
There were 23 Lithuanian citizens arrested abroad for narcotics trafficking in 1999.
Police suspect that some of them belong to organized crime groups, while others may have been hired as couriers.
Corruption.
The USG is unaware of any official narcotics-related corruption in Lithuania.
Agreements and Treaties.
Lithuania is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, the 1961 UN Single Convention and its 1972 Protocol, as well as the 1971 UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances.
A mutual legal assistance treaty between Lithuania and the U.S. entered into force in August 1999.
Lithuania and the U.S. have a 1924 extradition treaty and a 1935 supplementary treaty that is still in force.
Cultivation/Production.
A law prohibiting the cultivation of poppies was passed in 1998 and large poppy fields are identified and destroyed in order to limit the supply of poppy straw.
In 1999, police detected and destroyed three times more cannabis (1842 square meters) and almost the same amount of poppy crops (33,697 square meters) as 1998.
Although use of poppy has decrease and cannabis has become more popular, opium extracts derived from poppy straw still remain the predominant intravenous narcotic.
A law on control of precursors (substances used in the manufacture of illegal drugs), based on recommendations by the European Union "PHARE" program, was adopted in May 1999.
Drug Flow/Transit.
No exact figures are available.
However, collateral information from neighboring countries indicates that Lithuania is a crossroads for narcotics transiting through the Baltic area of Eastern Europe.
Lithuanian poppy straw in excess of domestic use is exported to Latvia and the Kaliningrad.
Marijuana and hashish comes to Lithuania both from the east and from the west, by land and by sea.
Heroin arrives to Lithuania from Russia.
Cocaine is transported to Lithuania from the South America via Germany.
In 1999, Lithuanian police registered their first discovery of an attempt to transport a cocaine shipment inside a person's stomach.
Most amphetamines arrive in Lithuania from Poland.
Lithuanian police have information that Lithuanian-produced synthetic drugs are being exported to Russia.
Lithuanian police estimate that annual narcotics trade turnover in Lithuania could stand at about $75 million.
Lithuanian law enforcement agencies are aware that Lithuania is being used for narcotics transit, and in 1999, a new counternarcotics division was established at the Customs Department to increase the number of interdictions.
The impact of the new division is expected to be slow, as it presently lacks both practical experience and theoretical knowledge.
Demand Reduction.
In 1998, a law on the control of drugs and psychotropic substances was adopted.
In September 1999, the GOL approved a drug prevention program for 1999-2003.
The program's main strategy is to focus on the improvement of counter-narcotics policy; increase of control of narcotics contraband and trade; increase on control of precursors and psychotropic substances use; and the preventive education and treatment of narcotic addicts, including rehabilitation and social integration of narcotic addicts.
The law on narcological supervision, passed in 1997, provided narcotic addicts with the right to health care and social services, as well as to confidentiality.
Anonymous consultation and needle/syringe replacement offices were opened in 1997 and presently operate in all major cities.
These efforts have resulted in somewhat better contact with drug users on the social fringes, and in a slower spread of HIV infection in Lithuania than in neighboring Latvia, Belarus, and Kaliningrad oblast.
The methadone treatment programs were started in major cities in1995.
Approximately 800-900 of the approximately 3,000 officially registered drug-dependent individuals had access to treatment and rehabilitation in 1999.
The use of drugs in Lithuania is punishable by administrative measures, with a maximum fine of $250.
The illegal manufacture, purchase, or possession of narcotic substances with no intent to sell is punishable by imprisonment for up to three years; possession with intent to sell is punishable by imprisonment for up to 15 years (and with repeated offences, up to 20 years).
If the amount of drugs confiscated is small (for one's own use) and the offense has been made for the first time, the court's sentence on detention is usually postponed on the condition that the offender enters a treatment program.
Unfortunately, treatment programs exist only in big cities.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
The GOL is working with the U.S., neighboring countries, and international institutions to strengthen law enforcement bodies and drug control programs.
The Road Ahead.
The GOL needs to implement its prevention program to reduce the use of narcotics among student age youth.
Equally important, Lithuanian police need to assign more personnel to investigation of organized crime in drug trafficking.
The USG will continue to assist Lithuania to meet the obligations associated with ratification of the 1988 UN Drug Convention and to support Lithuania's inclusion in programs aimed at the Baltic region.
In 1999, the USG sponsored a regional money-laundering seminar in Lithuania in 1999.
In 2000, the U.S. State Department will fund training courses in advanced drug enforcement and on conducting investigations of money laundering, assets forfeiture, and clandestine laboratories.
Luxembourg
I. Summary
Luxembourg is a transit country for drugs destined for western European markets.
Despite one of the highest per capita GDPs in the 15-member European Union (EU), the Grand Duchy also has one of the highest rates of substance abuse.
The government has actively sought to discourage negative perceptions of it as a haven for laundered funds with a number of countermeasures, including the recent passage of comprehensive and more aggressive legislation; local authorities have redoubled both enforcement of the legislation and their already vigorous cooperation with international anti-narcotics efforts.
Other legislation has been amended to focus on prevention and therapy rather than punishment.
In 1999, Luxembourg became a founding member of the Council of Europe's Anti-Corruption Convention, and will likely ratify the U.S.-Luxembourg Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty (MLAT) and Extradition Treaty in 2000.
Luxembourg is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Luxembourg is not a significant producer of narcotics or precursor chemicals, but it continues to be used as a transit country for drugs entering western European countries.
Law enforcement authorities are concerned about drugs transiting the country through Findel Airport and overland through neighboring countries.
Dutch and Belgian drug traffickers are the main link for smaller Luxembourg-based groups.
Despite a marked lack of the traditional social indicators that have been associated with drug abuse (unemployment, property crimes, migration, housing density and low socioeconomic status), Luxembourg still suffers one of the highest substance abuse rates in the EU.
Of a population of 420,000, an estimated 2500 are known drug users.
Estimates of problem drug use in Luxembourg range from 8.2 to 8.6 per 1000 inhabitants aged 15-54.
Opiates (mostly heroin) are responsible for over 80 percent of admissions into drug treatment centers, with cocaine a far second at 15 percent (another anomaly in EU statistics).
Despite the high levels of injected drug use, only three percent of identified users are known to be HIV positive.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
Luxembourg's newly elected government has increased policy focus on domestic drug prevention and treatment.
Draft legislation likely to be passed in 2000 will amend laws and punish "soft drug" use with fines rather than prison sentences, and "hard drug" use with mandatory therapy in conjunction with, or in lieu of, prison sentences.
Law enforcement authorities have undertaken to enforce strictly new anti-money laundering legislation and the government has increased its already vigorous cooperation with foreign law enforcement officials, including those from the U.S.
Accomplishments.
A fund established in 1992 from drug- related money-laundering seizures in Luxembourg (currently worth over one million USD) helps finance anti-drug trafficking efforts in several South American countries.
Luxembourg also contributes 1.1 million USD to UNDCP's alternative development program fund in Laos and Vietnam.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
In the first nine months of 1999, Luxembourg authorities seized the following: heroin - 1.148 kg; cocaine - 0.278 kg; amphetamines - 0.16 kg; hashish - 0.320 kg; marijuana - 1.984 kg; cannabis plants - 0.77 kg; mushrooms - 0.43 kg; LSD - 1 dose; ecstasy - 354 pills; and methadone - 180 ml.
In this period, 73 individuals were arrested, 1321 were warned and 1024 were charged in drug-related incidents.
Corruption.
There were no cases of drug-related government corruption in 1999.
Agreements and Treaties.
Luxembourg is party to and complies with the goals and objectives of the 1988 UN Drug Convention, the 1961 UN Single Convention and its 1972 Protocol, and the 1971 UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances.
Luxembourg participates in international counternarcotics groups including the Dublin Group, the Financial Action Task Force (FATF) and the UNDCP "Major Donors" group.
In 1999, Luxembourg became a founding member of the Council of Europe Anti-Corruption Convention.
A mutual legal assistance treaty (MLAT) and an updated extradition treaty between the U.S. and Luxembourg await ratification by Parliament, which is likely to take place in 2000.
Cultivation and Production.
There was no reported cultivation or production of illicit drugs or precursors in Luxembourg in 1999.
Domestic Programs.
Public debate on cannabis use for medical purposes has intensified and, while Luxembourg's new government does not support the decriminalization of cannabis, it will not oppose any liberalization in this regard at the EU level.
The government plans to establish a legal framework for the methadone program for heroin addicts that the Ministry of Health has run for the past 10 years.
The Ministry of Health also distributes information and runs a 24-hour support hot line on drug use.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
Luxembourg and U.S. law enforcement authorities cooperate closely on drug and judicial matters, particularly as they relate to money laundering investigations.
Luxembourg police routinely contact DEA Brussels with information from suspicious transaction reports with a U.S. nexus.
In 1999, Luxembourg authorities worked with DEA Brussels and Belgian gendarmerie to investigate a Brussels-based trafficking organization that attempted to move its base of operations to Luxembourg City; this cooperative effort led to the arrest of two of the principals and a seizure of cocaine and heroin.
The Road Ahead.
Luxembourg and the U.S. will continue close cooperation on narcotics and money-laundering cases, which will be enhanced when the new U.S.-Luxembourg MLAT and updated extradition treaty enter into force.
Macedonia, Former Yugoslav Republic of
I. Summary
Macedonia is not a major producer or transit point for illicit drugs.
However, illicit drug trafficking increased dramatically during 1999.
The war in Kosovo and the air strikes against Yugoslavia are mainly responsible for the loosening of border restrictions and frontier regimes.
The flow of drugs being smuggled into Western Europe through Macedonia increased with the reestablishment of a shorter and more direct east-west link and the abandonment of the traditional Balkan "road of drugs" (Sofia-Dimitrovgrad-Belgrade-Western Europe).
The increased flow of drugs through Macedonia has also fueled domestic consumption and local drug-trafficking.
Macedonia is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Macedonia is a transshipment point for drug trafficking between Turkey and Western Europe.
Illicit narcotics trafficking increased along the east-west link through Bulgaria and Albania, but dropped along the Balkan route through Yugoslavia as a result of NATO air strikes against Yugoslavia and the war in Kosovo.
Some recent seizures of acetic anhydride on the Kosovo border indicate that Kosovo has gained importance both as a market and a production area.
The main reasons cited for the sharp rise in narcotics trafficking include a lack of resources available to interdict illegal drugs, better organized criminal elements operating in Macedonia from Albania, and more open border crossings.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
The Ministry of Interior undertook an active counternarcotics program in 1999.
The process of establishing a counternarcotics unit continued.
Presently there is an operational counternarcotics unit at the national level, while on the local level the firearms and the drug enforcement units work jointly.
The Ministry of Interior is actively involved in the Interpol/Pro-Balkan program.
Accomplishments.
The Government of Macedonia developed legislation to allow for limited asset seizure.
Currently, Macedonian police and customs authorities can seize only vehicles involved in drug trafficking.
Law Enforcement.
Efforts.
In 1999, the Ministry of Interior opened 211 illicit cultivation and production related cases.
The activities of the Ministry of Interior resulted in the following seizures: 11.6 kilograms of raw opium; 14.4 kilograms of heroin; 3 kilograms of cocaine; 750 grams of dissolved cocaine; 650 tons of marihuana and 103 grams of marihuana seeds; 151,262 cannabis sativa plants; 89.66 grams of hashish; 5,433 tablets of ecstasy; 6 tons and 540 liters of acetic anhydride; 3.988 grams of alkaloids; 50 uncut poppy heads; 2 bottles of methadone; 2,700 tablets of phenobarbiturates; and 135 tablets and 8 bottles of heptanone.
In that same period, the authorities brought 42 cases of narcotics dealing against 52 individuals.
Authorities filed 438 requests for pressing criminal charges against 475 individual addicts.
Illicit Cultivation/Production.
Macedonia is not a major cultivator or producer of illicit narcotics.
There is legal opium poppy cultivation that is strictly controlled.
Production is by individual farmer-contractors or big socially-owned agricultural plants.
Alkaloid, the only factory in Macedonia that processes the opium poppy, provides the contractors with poppy seeds and buys out the poppies and poppy straw.
There have been no reports of diversion.
Production is reported to the Macedonian Ministry of Health and through the Ministry of Interior to the INCB (International Narcotics Control Bureau) in Vienna.
There are no reports of illicit production or refining of heroin.
Some recent cases under investigation have given rise to unconfirmed reports that there is a laboratory illegally producing heroin in Macedonia, but there has been no proof.
There is some unknown quantity of illicit cultivation of cannabis, mainly for personal consumption.
The government has an active program against illicit cultivation.
In August, the police eradicated a large field of marijuana near Skopje.
Demand Reduction.
Of the total of 3,432 registered drug addicts, 2,978 are men and 454 are women.
Public awareness programs are scarce and supported primarily by international organizations.
There have been some efforts by NGO's to begin prevention programs, but those are also scarce and ineffective.
Limited treatment of addicts is financed by the state.
Addicts are given methadone on the basis of a certificate confirming that they are receiving treatment in state-owned institutions.
Agreements and Treaties.
Macedonia is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
Bilateral Cooperation.
While a non-resident DEA Country Attaché has been accredited in Macedonia since 1997, the U.S. is working to expand DEA's presence in Macedonia with a local employee.
The U.S. encourages anti-drug support from nations, primarily in Western Europe, most directly affected by the drug problems from this region.
In 1999, the U.S. did not provide training seminars for drug enforcement officers because of the crises in Kosovo and the bombardment of Yugoslavia.
Conditioned by the political situation in the region, cooperation with the neighboring countries is uneven.
There have been no reports of regional cooperation on actual cases.
Cooperation with Western European police services resulted in a 1.5 tons cocaine seizure in Vienna.
The Road Ahead.
The U.S. will continue encouraging Macedonia to expand its drug control activities, enact anti-drug legislation, and improve its counter-narcotic enforcement capabilities.
In 2000, the U.S. will also provide training programs and limited equipment to Macedonia and plans to assign a regional legal advisor.
Malta
I. Summary
Drug abuse in Malta involves primarily heroin and ecstasy, and local narcotics seizures, generally of heroin, have been small.
The various agencies in Malta which combat drug trafficking and abuse, including the police, Customs, the National Drug Intelligence Unit (NDIU), the military and SEDQA, appear to disagree on the level of severity of the drug problem.
Government efforts to combat trafficking and abuse continue to increase, and have begun to reap tangible results.
This success is in part a reflection of training received there in 1996, 1997 and 1998 from the DEA and FBI, which focused on counternarcotics, organized crime, money laundering, and investigative techniques.
Malta is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Malta is not now, nor is it likely to become soon, internationally significant in the production or trafficking of illegal drugs, or prominent in money laundering.
Malta's large freeport container operations, however, may be used for transfer of shipments by narcotics traffickers, and some features of its financial system, particularly banking secrecy, may provide some facility for the laundering of drug money.
III.
Country Action Plan against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
The Government of Malta (GOM) has clearly placed great importance on aggressively combating drugs and drug-related problems and will actively pursue illegal drug operations.
The Special Police Commissioner for drug-related matters and the National Drug Intelligence Unit (NDIU) remain key to the GOM's efforts.
Accomplishments.
The GOM is concerned over the increase in small-scale local drug trafficking and drug abuse.
In 1999, Maltese police conducted 808 raids/seizures, made 733 arrests, 207 arraignments for possession and 109 arraignments for trafficking.
For the first 11 months of 1999, the Maltese police seized 454 ecstasy pills (458 by end of year), 1.3 kg of cocaine and 1.7 kg of heroin.
The GOM's most visible counternarcotics efforts remained in the areas of education and demand reduction.
SEDQA, a national organization dedicated to drug and alcohol rehabilitation, coordinated these activities.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
The police and the armed forces routinely attempt to interrupt local drug trafficking and drug abuse, which tend to be small-scale, limited to consumer quantities of the illegal drugs.
Maltese authorities have also increased efforts to prevent the movement of drugs through the airport and the sea terminal.
Although monitoring the movement of drugs through the freeport remains difficult because of the high volume of containers moving through, the authorities have shown they can act decisively when notified by foreign law enforcement authorities of transshipment attempts.
No extradition, mutual legal assistance or law enforcement or transit cooperation issues directly related to drug trafficking arose in 1999.
Corruption.
Malta has appropriate laws governing official corruption.
Post is not aware of any problems related to or associated with corruption of public officials due to illegal drug activities.
Agreements and Treaties.
The U.S. and Malta cooperate in extradition matters under the 1931 U.S.-UK Extradition Treaty, which is applicable to Malta.
A Maltese national was extradited to the U.S. in 1998 in a bank fraud case.
Malta is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, and ratified in November 1999 the Council of Europe convention on money laundering.
Cultivation/Production.
There is no significant cultivation/production of narcotics in Malta.
Malta does not produce or have precursor or essential chemicals.
Drug flow/Transit.
At present, there is no apparent indication that Malta is a major trafficking location.
It is impossible, however, to quantify drug movements through the Malta freeport which likely do occur.
Domestic Programs.
SEDQA, a GOM-funded agency, runs awareness and drug education programs in the school system and organizes programs for parents at the agency headquarters.
In addition, SEDQA develops and runs on local TV stations commercials on drug awareness and education issues.
A nation-wide European values study indicated that 81 percent consider drug abuse a "serious problem," compared with 43 percent in 1984.
Increased public awareness will likely translate into increased public support for interdiction efforts.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
U.S. Policy Initiatives.
The U.S. continues to pursue its overall policy of close cooperation among law enforcement officials on drug matters.
With the arrival this year of the first resident regional security officer, the embassy will have a focal point to consolidate and expand law enforcement cooperation.
Bilateral Cooperation.
In 1996, 1997 and 1998 the U.S. (DEA or FBI) conducted one seminar each year for Malta's law enforcement community.
The most recent was a one-week training seminar, which the FBI ran in October 1998 on general investigative techniques for Maltese police, armed forces, customs and the NDIU.
There were no U.S.-sponsored seminars in 1999.
The GOM remains very interested in receiving additional training assistance from U.S. law enforcement agencies, in particular on forensic investigative techniques.
The Road Ahead.
We anticipate continued cooperation of the Maltese authorities on illegal drug and other issues of mutual concern.
Moldova
I. Summary
Moldova is not a significant narcotics producer and its low per capita income makes it an unattractive market for drugs.
Moldova, particularly the area along its eastern border, is being used for the transshipment of illegal narcotics from, and precursor chemicals to, Central Asia.
Moldova has been in a severe economic crisis since the end of 1998, which has negatively affected its law enforcement efforts.
With very limited financial resources, Moldova has had a difficult time meeting its obligations under the 1998 UN Drug convention.
The Ministry of Internal Affairs (MIA) has a Department to Combat Organized Crime and Corruption (DCOCC).
The government submitted a draft anti-money laundering law to Parliament which was still pending at year's end.
The U.S. is assisting all ministries and departments in Moldova that are involved in counternarcotics affairs.
The U.S. continued to provide training and technical assistance to Moldovan officials in 1999.
Moldova is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
Moldova does not produce a significant quantity of narcotics.
With the eastern border of Moldova controlled by the "authorities" of the illegal and unrecognized, self-declared "Transnistrian Republic," Moldova (primarily Transnistria) is used as a transshipment route for a large amount of contraband, including narcotics to and from Central Asia and Europe.
It is not a regional or international banking center and generally has an underdeveloped banking system, with little evidence of extensive money laundering.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
Moldova's anti-drug policies remained basically unchanged during 1999.
The Government submitted a draft anti-money laundering law to parliament.
Parliament approved the draft in November after the first reading, but did not have the second reading on the draft before the end of the year.
The Government is preparing a national program to combat illegal drug trafficking and organized crime.
Several different ministries will be involved in implementing the program in 2000.
Accomplishments.
The Moldovan Government continued its efforts to meet its obligations under the 1988 UN Drug Convention and other international narcotics agreements to which Moldova is a party.
The ongoing economic crisis, however has limited funding available for counternarcotics or other enforcement efforts.
The DCOCC reported that it investigated twenty drug cases involving organized crime groups, leading to imprisonment of sixteen defendants and fines for three others.
The DCOCC further reported that during 1998 and in the first six months of 1999, 26 other cases of organized crime were investigated and prosecuted.
Twenty-four people were imprisoned and eighteen were fined.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
According to MIA statistic, during the nine month period ending September 1999, police and customs officials made the following seizures: 468 kilos of poppy straw; 158 kilos of marijuana; and 27 liters of opium extract.
Thirteen kilos of heroin were seized while transiting Moldova in 1998.
The Ministry also noted that drug traffickers were carrying smaller amounts of narcotics to reduce any possible detection and increased criminal sentence.
Corruption.
The DCOCC, created in 1997, continued its operations.
The Department investigated five cases involving corruption in 1998 and the first six months of 1999: two defendants were imprisoned, one fined, and one given amnesty after conviction.
One case was indefinitely postponed.
Acceptance of bribes reportedly continues to interfere with the government's counternarcotics efforts.
Moldova has no law specifically dealing with narcotics-related corruption.
Agreements and Treaties.
Moldova is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention, the 1961 Single Convention on Narcotics and its 1972 Protocol, and the 1972 UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances.
Moldova is also a party to the 1992 CIS treaty which requires Ministries of Internal Affairs to cooperate in combating illegal drug trafficking.
On November 11, Parliament ratified the Southeast European Cooperative Initiative (SECI) agreement to combat cross border crime.
Cultivation/Production.
The principal locally produced narcotic substance is hemp, originally introduced for rope making.
Cannabis continues to be legally cultivated in southern regions and narcotic quality plants grow as weeds throughout the country.
No reliable production estimates are available, but criminal elements have capitalized on hemp's ready availability.
According to Moldovan authorities, oil-bearing poppies are legally grown by 20 % of the rural population, primarily in the northern regions.
Other domestically produced substances include synthetic and semi-synthetic drugs including ephedrine, pervitin, omnoponi, and methadone.
None of these substances are exported in significant quantities.
There is no evidence that significant quantities of precursor or essential chemicals are produced in Moldova.
Drug Flow/Transit.
Since 1991, the illegal and unrecognized, self-declared "Transnistrian Republic" has controlled much of Moldova's eastern border.
There is significant anecdotal evidence that this area is used to transship all types of contraband, including narcotics.
Intermittent seizures by Moldovan officials indicate that Moldova is used as a transit route for moving heroin from Afghanistan and cocaine from South America to Europe.
Precursor chemicals move from Europe through Moldova to Central Asia.
Demand Reduction.
Being readily available, opium and cannabis products are the most abused drugs in Moldova.
Other drugs such as cocaine and heroin are available to a lesser extent and the high cost of these drugs makes them unattractive to most Moldovans.
On the other hand, synthetic drugs such as LSD and Ecstasy are available and relatively inexpensive, making them popular with Moldovan youth.
The Ministry of Health registered 5008 persons in drug treatment programs during the first ten months of 1999.
This is an increase of 1039 addicts over the same time period in 1998.
Accurate statistics on the actual number of narcotics users are unavailable, but according to estimates of the Ministries of Health and Internal Affairs, approximately 60,000 people use drugs in Moldova but are not officially registered as addicts.
With continuing reduced health care spending due to the economic crisis, spending for Moldova's demand reduction program will remain constant at best.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives and Programs
U.S. Policy Initiatives.
U.S. assistance is aimed at enhancing the ability of the Moldovan drug squad and Customs to interdict international narcotics shipments and increasing the competence of the DCOCC to deal with these interrelated problems.
U.S. counternarcotics training is also being conducted for prosecutors and judges.
Bilateral Cooperation.
One U.S. Customs adviser began working in September 1999 with the Moldovan Government, through the SECI program, on the full range of customs and border control issues.
One of the primary goals of this program is to help modernize Moldova's border control system.
The program will contribute to combating contraband smuggling, drug trafficking, and the shadow economy.
The U.S. Embassy's new law enforcement training assistant, funded by the Bureau for International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs in the Department of State, also began working in August.
Moldovan police and Customs officials continued to attend training programs conducted by U.S. law enforcement officials, in both the U.S. and Europe.
Three law enforcement officials from the Ministry of Internal affairs, the Ministry of National Security, and the General Prosecutor's office were nominated to participate in the Department of State's International Visitor program.
Beside training courses which are held locally, Moldovan judges, prosecutors, and police regularly attend regional conferences and seminars conducted by the U.S. Departments of Justice and Treasury and the FBI.
One of these programs is the eight week mid-level police officers course at the International Law Enforcement Academy in Budapest, Hungary.
Among the subjects covered in various courses are prosecuting organized crime, money laundering, and public corruption.
The U.S. Department of Justice's National Institute of Justice and a local non-governmental organization administer an INL-funded project to develop and operate a criminal justice information network in Moldova.
Road Ahead.
The U.S. Customs Advisory program was expanded with the addition of an additional U.S. Customs adviser in December 1999.
An FBI agent is also scheduled to begin work in 2000 to assist Moldova in working with the SECI Center in Bucharest to combat cross-border crime.
Netherlands
I. Summary
Despite the high priority given by the Dutch government to fighting narcotics trafficking, the Netherlands continues to be an important transit point for drugs entering Europe, a major producer and exporter of amphetamines and synthetic drugs, and an important consumer of most illicit drugs.
The amount of ecstasy exported to the U.S. during 1999 increased dramatically.
A total of over 3.5 million dosage units of ecstasy, either in the U.S., or in Europe and bound for the U.S., were seized between January and October 1999.
The Netherlands' Special Synthetic Drug Unit (USD), set up in 1997 to coordinate the fight against designer drugs, has better defined the problem of Dutch synthetic drug production and trade, and is making every effort to combat designer drug production through dismantling of production sites.
The Netherlands works closely with the U.S. in fighting international crime, including drug trafficking and related money laundering.
This includes joint anti-drug operations in the Caribbean, based on an interim agreement establishing forward operating locations (FOL) on the Dutch islands of Aruba and Curacao.
Drug abuse, as opposed to trafficking, is viewed primarily as a public health issue.
The Dutch have extensive demand-reduction programs that reach about 75 percent of the country's estimated 25,000 to 28,000 hard drug users.
The Dutch are major donors to the UNDCP, members of the Dublin Group, and chair its Central European Regional Group.
The Dutch are also active in the Financial Action Task Force (FATF) and play a key role in the Caribbean Action Task Force (CFATF).
The Netherlands is a party to the 1988 UN Drug Convention.
II.
Status of Country
The geographical position of the Netherlands and its modern transportation and communications infrastructure (including the world's busiest seaport in Rotterdam), make the country a key site for drugs entering and transiting Europe.
Production of amphetamines, ecstasy and other synthetic drugs and marijuana is significant.
As a center for the international chemical industry, the Netherlands also attracts individuals trying to obtain or produce precursors used to manufacture illicit drugs.
The country's highly-developed financial sector provides myriad opportunities for money laundering.
The Dutch Opium Act punishes possession, commercial distribution, production, import, and export of all illicit drugs, but distinguishes between "hard" drugs that have "unacceptable" risks (heroin, cocaine, ecstasy, etc.), and "soft" drugs (cannabis).
Trafficking in the former is prosecuted vigorously.
Sales of small amounts (under five grams) of the latter are "tolerated" (i.e., not prosecuted, even though technically illegal) in "coffeeshops" operating under regulated conditions (no minors on premises, no alcohol sales, no hard drug sales, no advertising, and no "public nuisance").
One of the aims of this controversial policy is to separate the markets for soft and hard drugs so that soft drug users are less likely to come into contact with hard drugs.
It is much-debated and includes inherent contradictions.
More vigorous application of the criteria for coffeeshop operations, however, has reduced the number of such points of sale.
III.
Country Actions Against Drugs in 1999
Policy Initiatives.
The Dutch government's progress report on its 1997-1999 drug policy calls for continuation of existing drug policies, and concludes that the government's fight against the production of synthetic drugs is increasingly effective, in view of the large seizures, improved information, and increased cooperation.
According to the progress report, 88 percent of Dutch municipalities, in cooperation with police and justice authorities, have adopted measures to limit the number of coffeeshops selling soft drugs and intensify controls in their communities.
Although an earlier study showed the number of coffeeshops dropped by 15 percent between 1995 and 1997 to about 1,179, there are indications the number has now stabilized.
A new survey will take place in 2000.
In the spring of 1999, a law became effective which gives mayors the power to close down coffeeshops, even when such premises have met all regulatory requirements.
New legislation was adopted banning all indoor cultivation of Dutch-grown marijuana ("Nederwiet"), and penalties on dealing and producing soft drugs were raised.
Dutch Justice Minister Korthals recently said in response to a letter by mayors of 20 Dutch cities that legalization of cannabis is out of the question at this point, in view of international treaties.
The mayors cited the "controversial and hypocritical situation" under which customers of coffeeshops are allowed to buy a small amount of cannabis products, while back-door suppliers are subject to prosecution.
Korthals noted that a report on Dutch soft drug policy will be presented to parliament in spring 2000.
An international research program on the medical use of marijuana was launched in June 1999, in which some 60 Dutch cancer patients participate.
They are given "Cannador" capsules, which contain the active ingredient of marijuana.
The capsules are directly imported from Switzerland, under special license from the Dutch Health Ministry.
The Netherlands plan to have a special bureau to oversee the cultivation and processing of marijuana for medical purposes by the end of this year.
Dutch Health Minister Borsht has expressed deep concern about the results of research demonstrating the damaging effects of ecstasy use.
The study pointed to brain damage affecting memory and concentration, and showed that ecstasy use can cause depression.
The minister has pledged additional funds for further neuro-toxicity research, in which there is much international interest.
He also announced a ban on the import, export, trade and possession of the synthetic drug 4-MTA by placing it on List I of the Dutch Opium Act.
Pilot programs for medically-supervised distribution of heroin to chronically-addicted users continued in Amsterdam (100 participants) and Rotterdam (92), with a second treatment unit to be opened in Amsterdam.
The establishment of similar projects in The Hague, Utrecht, Groningen and Heerlen were postponed, however.
An experiment began in 1999 on the effects of anesthetic on hard drug addicts given Naltrexon (which counteracts the craving for opiates) while undergoing detoxification.
In addition, a pilot program began in which addicts are given higher dosages of methadone than usually prescribed, following the encouragement of a report of success in the U.S. with high-dose methadone maintenance programs.
A final assessment of the Dutch experiment is planned for 2000.
While the number of cocaine addicts seeking treatment increased significantly, the number of hard drug addicts appears to have stabilized in the past few years (their average age now 38), and Dutch authorities assert that the number of drug-related deaths in the Netherlands remains the lowest in Europe.
HIV infection among addicts is relatively low.
Accomplishments.
With the establishment of the USD in September 1997, better insight has been gained into the nature and extent of production of and trade in synthetic drugs.
USD's 1998 annual report, indicating discovery of 35 production sites, confirms the picture of the Netherlands as an important producer of synthetic drugs (see below).
In April 1999, the Finance Ministry headed up a new national coordination committee on chemical precursors to improve cooperation and coordination between the five ministries dealing with the problem.
Law Enforcement Efforts.
While the Ministry of Health coordinates drug policy, the Ministry of Justice is responsible for law enforcement.
Matters relating to local government and the police are the responsibility of the Ministry of the Interior.
At the municipal level, policy is coordinated in the tripartite consultations between the mayor, the chief public prosecutor and the chief of police.
Dutch police and prosecutors give high priority to combating drug trafficking.
Dutch laws and police methods at times impede such law enforcement efforts, however.
In 1998, in response to controversy arising from controlled drug deliveries, the Dutch government tightened rules governing criminal investigation methods used by police and justice, particularly in undercover operations.
The use of criminals to infiltrate criminal organizations is now allowed only in very exceptional cases, after personal approval by the Justice Minister.
The same applies to the use of controlled drug deliveries.
Dutch police investigative methods tend to be extremely compartmentalized and do not allow much leeway in taking on additional requests from the international law enforcement community.
Police teams are forced to identify a task or organization to be investigated, commit personnel, and define a timeline for the investigation.
This inflexible policy often means that new areas of inquiry must be forced artificially into the confines of existing investigations.
There is no Dutch police entity dedicated to responding to international requests, which at times means that international law enforcement agencies "shop" for an investigative team to assist in a case.
It is not uncommon for such requests to be met with the response that Dutch police teams have "no capacity" to assist.
Dutch law also does not provide for plea bargaining, thereby removing much incentive for defendants to cooperate in investigations, and impeding the ability of prosecutors to obtain evidence against leaders of criminal organizations.
The following agencies play an important role in implementing policy: the 25 regional police forces and their special criminal information services; the national police services force; the national criminal intelligence division (CRI) of the national police services force, which coordinates efforts to counter drug trafficking; and the Customs authorities and information center.
Information sharing can be a major problem.
Although Dutch police and investigative agencies are required, for purposes of coordination, to furnish information and intelligence on criminal investigations to the CRI, at times this process fails, resulting in two or more police entities targeting the same criminals, unaware of the interest and activities of the others.
It is unclear whether the CRI has line authority to enforce this information-sharing policy.
The Netherlands has efficient national chemical control legislation in place, fully operational since 1995, which imposes record keeping and reporting requirements for listed chemicals.
Dutch laws include export license procedures, including information about the shipment and the credentials of the buyer and shipper.
Penalties for violations of these laws are seizure of chemicals and up to six years in prison.
The Netherlands does not have a fixed counternarcotics budget.
The funds are disbursed through several distinct programs and organs of the government.
In July 1995, the law on the "prevention of chemical abuse" came into force, bringing the precursors for synthetic drugs within the scope of a licensing system.
The law meets Dutch commitments under the 1988 UN Drug Convention and under 1990 EU regulations.
Violations of the law can lead to prison sentences (maximum of six years), fines (up to 50,000 dollars), or asset seizures.
In 1999, the investigation section of the Economics Ministry's Economic Control Service (ECD), charged with precursor controls, was transferred to the Ministry of Finance.
This development is being closely followed by embassy and DEA personnel at post due to a perception that this move might lessen the criminal enforcement priorities in favor of greater concerns over revenue issues.
Corruption.
There were no reported cases in 1999 of corruption of public officials as a result of illegal drug activities.
The Netherlands will host the May 2001 follow-up meeting to the conference against corruption convened by the Vice President in February 1999, and is working closely with U.S. officials to ensure the success of this anti-corruption initiative.
Agreements and Treaties.
The Netherlands has ratified both the 1988 UN Drug Convention and the 1990 Strasbourg Convention on Money Laundering and Confiscation.
Measures to counter money laundering are being extended throughout the Kingdom to include the Netherlands Antilles and Aruba.
The U.S. and the Netherlands have agreements on extradition, mutual legal assistance, and asset sharing.
The Netherlands has enacted legislation on money laundering and controls on chemical precursors, is party to agreements on a method of maintaining records of transactions of an established list of precursor/essential chemicals, and is a member of the UN Commission on Narcotics Drugs.
It is a member of the Major Donors group of the UNDCP, to which it contributes some $750,000 per year, and participates in the FATF and CATF.
The Netherlands is a leading member of the Dublin Group, chairing the Central European Regional Dublin group, and is member of the daily management of the Caribbean Customs Law Enforcement Council (CCLEC).
The Dutch are very active in the Caribbean region through the Barbados action plan, contribute to the Caribbean Coordination Mechanism (CCM), to maritime cooperation in the area, and, through the EU, it contributes to the Project Management Office (PMO) by making available one expert and paying 20 percent of the costs.
At the Peru Donor Conference, the Dutch pledged about $10 million in debt relief, which is to be used for counternarcotics programs.
The Netherlands contributed $500,000 in 1999 on relief aid to a UNDCP program to create alternatives for poppy and cannabis cultivation in Afghanistan.
The Netherlands participates in various police and criminal justice working groups of the Pompidou Group and in the narcotics working group set up in the context of the Schengen treaty, and is actively implementing the Benelux Agreement on Extradition, and the European Convention on Extradition and Mutual Assistance.
Dutch police, justice and customs officials have close contacts with their colleagues in Belgium, France, Germany and the UK.
The CRI has posted liaison officers in Thailand, Pakistan, Venezuela, Colombia, INTERPOL (in Lyon), the Netherlands Antilles, Turkey, Poland and Spain.
New CRI posts have been opened in Hungary and Russia.
The Dutch also cooperate closely with the DEA.
EUROPOL is based in The Hague.
Cultivation/Production.
About 50 percent of the Netherlands' cannabis market is Dutch-grown marijuana ("Nederwiet").
The Dutch government continues to give top priority to the investigation and prosecution of large-scale commercial cultivation of Nederwiet and doubled the criminal penalty to four years imprisonment and/or a fine of about $50,000.
New legislation has been adopted closing loopholes and thus completing the ban on all indoor cultivation of hemp.
The USD reported that 35 synthetic drug production sites were discovered in 1998: 18 for the production of ecstasy, 15 for amphetamine, and two for a combination of amphetamine and ecstasy.
Further, 357 seizures of synthetic drugs that year could be connected in some way to the Netherlands.
(Seizures occurred in 26 countries spread over five continents, 35 percent in the Netherlands and 65 percent in other countries, particularly Germany and the UK.)
In the same period the USD registered 103 dumping-sites in the Netherlands, a total of about 107,000 liters of chemical waste.
The USD observed that Dutch criminals take an important place in the field of production of and trade in synthetic drugs, but noted that production is shifting to central and eastern European countries.
Drug Flow/Transport.
The Dutch government maintains tight border controls to combat the flow of drugs.
According to the Rotterdam customs information center, the container scanner in the port of Rotterdam, which became operational in early 1999, has already proved to be very successful.
The two container scanners at Schiphol airport are to become operational by early 2000.
According to the drug policy progress report, larger shipments of drugs are generally found in sea freight rather than in air freight.
Arrests at airports, however, are significantly higher: in 1998, some 818 drug couriers were arrested at Schiphol, and total drug seizures at the airport were more than 3,000 kilos.
Dutch customs made record seizures in 1999: 700 kilos of cocaine from Suriname at Schiphol airport, and 4,000 kilos of cocaine aboard a Peruvian vessel in Rotterdam port.
The Dutch intensified controls of highways, as well as trains, connecting the Netherlands to neighboring countries, which resulted in narcotics seizures and arrests.
Approximately 50 percent of hashish seized in the Netherlands enters from Morocco via France and Belgium; about 80 percent of the heroin seized enters from Germany by the so-called Balkan route.
The Dutch statistical office (CBS) estimates that domestic consumption of illicit drugs amounts to some $850 million per year, and another $700 million worth of drugs is exported.
According to the CBS, about two-thirds of total illicit drug earnings (more than 1.5 billion guilders) are made on cannabis products.
Domestic Programs.
The Netherlands has extensive demand-reduction and harm- reduction programs, reaching about 90-92 percent of the country's 25,000-28,000 hard drug users.
Since the protection of the health of drug users is a major priority, Dutch drug addicts are relatively well cared for.
A national drug monitoring office to coordinate the large number of monitoring activities related to drugs became operational in 1999.
From 1997 to 1998, the number of cocaine addicts seeking treatment rose 12 percent, to 5,879 people, while in 1999 the total number of hard drug users seeking treatment stood at 25,261.
At the end of 1999, the Health Ministry estimated a total of 323,000 cannabis users in the country, out of a population of more than 15.5 million.
Total costs of Dutch drug treatment programs in 1999 were estimated at 100 million dollars.
Drug prevention programs are organized through a network of local, regional and national institutions.
Schools are targeted in efforts to discourage drug use, while national campaigns are conducted in the mass media to reach the broader public.
The Netherlands requires school instruction on the dangers of alcohol and drugs as part of the health education curriculum.
The Netherlands Institute of Mental Health and Addiction (the Trimbos Institute) has developed projects in the field of alcohol and drugs in the context of teaching "healthy living" in classrooms.
IV.
U.S. Policy Initiatives
